1.	Introduction 

On a global scale, international student mobility has become an essential phenomenon in modern higher education, indicating the development speed of globalisation and the increased interconnectivity of institutional systems. The transnational migration of students for tertiary education has grown at an exponential rate in the last two decades so that global enrollment figures have reached unprecedented heights.    
Such mobility is driven by a complex nexus of factors that include a desire for a good education, opportunities to build a career, the opportunity to experience other cultures, and the aspiration to develop personally. As states compete to attract international talent, understanding decision-making processes and motivational antecedents that guide the choices of students in terms of where to go to school assumes renewed significance for policy makers, academic institutions and academics.  
India has become one of the largest source countries of international students in the world and in the process, is making a significant contribution to global student mobility flows. Driven by a rapidly growing middle class, increasing expectations for world-class education and perceived limitations in the domestic higher education capacity and quality, hundreds of thousands of Indian students pursue studies abroad each year in pursuit of undergraduate and postgraduate degrees. 
Historically, Indian students were stick to the Anglophone destinations, including the United States, the United Kingdom, Canada and Australia, due to prestige of the institutions, English language courses and established dispersion. In recent years, however, a noticeable diversification in the choice of destinations has been observed with European countries, especially those with affordable, good quality education, gaining ground among the Indian students.  
The Czech Republic is a part of the emerging and increasingly attractive destination in the changing world of international student mobility. Located at the heart of Central Europe, the Czech Republic offers a unique combination of characteristics that sets it apart from the traditional places of study. The nation is blessed with a well-founded higher education system of a number of historically important universities that are gaining an ever-growing international reputation. Universities within the Czech Republic do provide programmes taught in English in a range of fields, focusing especially on medicine and engineering, business and natural sciences.  
Additionally, the cost of education and the cost of living in the Czech Republic is significantly less than that in Western European countries and English-speaking countries, thus making it an economically best option for middle class families in India. Students have access to travel, cultural exchange, and potential employment prospects in the larger European market due to the country's strategic location inside the European Union.   
Moreover, the Czech Republic's high standard of living, rich cultural legacy, and generally safe climate make it a desirable location for academic study. Despite the growing number of Indian students in the Czech higher education institutions, there is still a considerable gap in the empirical knowledge of the determinants shaping the choice of destination. Existing scholarship offers a wealth of information regarding Indian student mobility to traditional host nations, as well as information on generally applicable factors that affect international student decision processes.  
However, there hasn't been much academic research on the precise rationale behind Indian students' preference for the Czech Republic over other options. The nation is a non-Anglophone, unique travel destination that faces competition from both leading Western universities and emerging European rivals, making this drawback particularly crucial. An explanation of the motivations, expectations, and decision-making processes of Indian students choosing the Czech Republic is of great importance for a number of stakeholders, including Czech universities trying to improve their recruitment strategies, Indian educational counsellors advising prospective students, policymakers in both countries hoping to enhance educational ties, and applicants who stand to gain from an evidence-based understanding of peer experiences and the factors that influence choices.  
The importance of this analysis goes beyond simply academic interest and has vital contributions to make to the field of international student mobility research.  
Firstly, by examining the destination choice from the point of view of Self-Determination Theory, which emphasises intrinsic motivation, autonomy, competence, and relatedness of human behaviour, it mainly advances theoretical understanding. This framework offers a thorough explanation of how practical factors and psychological needs interact to influence decisions about educational migration.        
Secondly, the study contributes to the practical need for evidence-based insights that can be incorporated into institutional strategies, marketing campaigns, and policy interventions with the goal of attracting and assisting Indian students in the Czech Republic.   
Thirdly, the research contributes to broader discussions regarding the diversification of international student flows and shifts in international higher education markets by focusing on an emerging destination.   
In the end, the results may have an impact on how geographical patterns of educational mobility are understood, as well as how non-traditional destinations help students from developing economies find accessible routes to international education.  
This dissertation is a systematic study, which examines the factors that affect the decision of Indian students to study for a higher education in the Czech Republic.  By using a quantitative survey methodology within the framework of the Self-Determination Theory and informed by an extensive review of the scholarly literature on student mobility, this study seeks to identify and assess the academic, financial, cultural, social and psychological factors affecting destination choice.  
 The empirical focus herein is narrowed down to Indian university students who are enrolled within Czech institutions and accordingly being able to capture in depth the lived experience, motivation drivers and perceptual construct of the students. Through this investigation, the study aims to contribute to the existing knowledge gap and provide practical information that may contribute to crafting policies that may lead to the Czech Republic's position as a favourable destination for Indian students seeking high quality, affordable and enriching international educational experiences.  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2. Objective and Methodology  
2.1 Objectives  
The current study will lead to answer the following Research Question: 
What are the key economic, psychological, and socio-cultural factors influencing Indian students’ decision to pursue higher education in the Czech Republic? 
To attain the answer to the question, focus is set on the following objectives that will be accessed to understand the influencing factors. 
1.	Analysing which economic factors such as tuition costs, cost of living, availability of scholarship and employment opportunities, attracts Indian students to Czech Republic. 
2.	To evaluate the psychological drivers namely the independence, self-growth, career progression, and avoid domestic ambiguities, which drive Indian students to pursue higher education in the Czech Republic. 
3.	Current live experiences of Indian students in the Czech Republic links to level of safety, affordability, and career opportunities along with work rights affect the choice of students who may choose to stay in the Czech Republic after graduation 
4.	The analysis of the demographic factors such as age, gender, level of degree, and the year of admission, is associated with the key motivation factors that drive students into studying in the Czech Republic. 
 
2.2 Hypotheses: 
By keeping objectives in frame, there must be some factors which can prove the bases of this research by their hypotheses.  
Hypothesis 1: Male and female Indian students have significantly different monthly expenditures. 
Hypothesis 2: Master’s level students have a significantly higher average monthly expenditure than bachelor’s level students. 
Hypothesis 3: Choice of institution significantly impacts a student's monthly expenditure. 
Hypothesis 4: Expenditure levels differ significantly between students who perceive high safety versus those who perceive low/moderate safety. 
Hypothesis 5: Students for whom affordability was a primary factor spend significantly different amounts on rent. 
Hypothesis 6: Gender significantly influences how Indian students manage their living expenses, suggesting a measurable difference between male and female. 
These hypotheses are then tested thoroughly by analysing data to see whether the result are actually significant.  
 
2.3 Methodology 
In this section, the methods through which this research is carried out and what technique or process we perform to gather data for further analysis:  
2.3.1 Data Collection 
The study employs quantitative research by utilizing a cross-sectional survey methodology. With the main aim of establishing patterns, relationships, and trends of the motivational profile of Indian students studying in the Czech Republic, it is exploratory and detailed. Further, the theoretical background of the research is Self-Determination Theory (SDT), which distinguishes between intrinsic (personal development, intellectual or academic interests and autonomy) and extrinsic motivators (financial gains, degree recognition, and job opportunities). 
2.3.1.1 Population and sampling 
 
•	Target population: The target group are the currently enrolled Indian students in the higher education universities in the Czech Republic and the university graduate students working in the country. The time frame of the research includes students who came to 2015-2025 to get wider understanding of the factors. During this decade, multiple changes happened in the world and in Czech Republic. Hence, it’s easy to find out if the factors are the same or not. • Sampling Technique:  The google link has been distributed to different channels: 
I.	Student associations: Distributed to Indian student community and cultural group organizations in Czech Republic like Studyin.cz 
II.	Social Media Platforms: Posting the survey link to relevant WhatsApp group, Facebook group, LinkedIn communities. 
III.	Printing and pasting QR copies in Dormitories and University boards. 
IV.	Snowball Sampling: Encouraging participants to share the survey with peers.             
 
•	Sample Size: The study aimed to attain at least 150-200 respondents where 178 respondents were finally received. The sample consists of students who are chosen as the reflection of the groups of different academic degrees, such as Bachelor, Master, Doctoral, and Postdoctoral, and who represent various age groups (18 to 40 years old). 
 
•	Participation Requirements:  
-	Indian Nationals 
-	Currently enrolled or graduated students from Czech Universities  
-	Arrived in year 2015 to 2025 
•	Limitations of Participants: 
-	Students who left the Czech Republic permanently. 
-	Students enrolled in short term courses like Erasmus or exchange. 
-	Never had Student visa. 
2.3.2 Survey Questionnaire 
A constructed, structured and self-administered questionnaire has been developed completely anonymously and distributed through Google Forms Online. This tool consists of items that are closed-ended only and most of the items have Likert- scales to measure the relative importance of various motivational antecedents. The questionnaire has been designed in such a way that it divides the information into several dimensions: 
 
• Section A: Demographic Information 
-	Age, Gender, Email address – Optional 
-	Current Status – Studying, Studying and Working, Graduated and Working, Other 
-	Year of Arrival in Czech Republic 
-	Name of University enrolled in 
-	Level of Degree enrolled in 
-	Medium of Instruction (English, Czech taught, other) 
•	Section B: Motivational Factors for staying Czech Republic: 
Rate the Importance from Extremely Important to Not Important 
-	Low tuition fees 
-	Affordability in living cost 
-	Scholarship Availability 
-	English Taught programs 
-	Global recognition of degree 
•	Section C: Motivational Factors for staying Czech Republic: 
Rate the Importance from Extremely Important to Not Important 
-	Safety and Low crime rate 
-	Post Study work options/rights 
-	Location in Europe/Travel opportunities 
-	Ease student visa 
-	Presence of Indian community 
• Section D: Living Experience and Employment 
-	Perception of Safety in the Czech Republic (Subjective answer) 
-	Assessment of cost of living (Affordable, manageable but rising, too expensive) 
-	Current employment status (Yes, No, Other) 
-	Weekly working hours: (Under 10, 10-20, 20-30, 30-40, 40+) 
-	If Income covers basic living expenses (Yes fully, Partially, No) 
The data was gathered over a period of 5 weeks to enable adequate response rates. The response was voluntary and the respondents were guaranteed confidentiality and anonymity in the beginning.  The survey was done with informed consent. 
2.3.3 Data Analysis Strategy 
As mentioned above, the data collected from the online survey was exported, cleaned, and analysed using descriptive statistics via spreadsheet software. The primary aim of this research is exploratory and descriptive and to follow that, Frequency distributions, percentages, and mean scores were calculated and visually represented through bar charts and pie charts to identify overarching trends has been used. To explore the economic and demographic aspects of the study, the analysis looked at practical pull factors like tuition costs, living expenses, job opportunities, and scholarship availability as external motivators. Basic cross-tabulation was used to link demographic variables, such as age, gender, degree level, and admission year, with these main motivational factors. This showed how various student groups prioritized their practical needs. 
More importantly, the analytical framework was based on Self-Determination Theory (SDT) to understand the psychological reasons behind destination choice and post-graduation plans. Survey responses were directly connected to SDT’s main intrinsic psychological needs: Autonomy, which is the desire for independence and avoiding domestic uncertainties; Competence, which drives personal growth, career advancement, and academic quality; and Relatedness, which involves feeling secure, safe, and connected in the host country. By examining the average importance scores and responses related to these psychological factors, the analysis evaluated how meeting these needs, along with current experiences like affordability, safety, and work rights, influenced the students' initial motivations and their later decisions to stay in the Czech Republic after graduation. 
3. Literature Review   
3.1 Theoretical Frameworks for International Student Mobility   
The phenomenon of international student mobility is complex. Researchers have looked at it from various angles, and each viewpoint offers different insights into why students decide to study abroad, how they make those decisions, and the effects of their choices. Self-determination theory and the Push-Pull Model are two theoretical models, in particular, that are relevant in explaining the factors that determine the destination choices of students. These models offer parallel positions whereby one is focused on the psychological factors behind motivation and the other the situational forces that lead and entice student mobility. Together, they provide a general basis of the analysis of the reasons why Indian students choose the Czech Republic as a study destination.  
3.1.1 Chapter of level 3 
Self-Determination Theory (SDT) developed by Deci and Ryan [31] is a general theoretical framework of human motivation, which has been implemented widely in various fields of activity, such as education, health, workplace, and sport. Its core is that SDT assumes that people have inherent psychological needs, the satisfaction of which promotes optimal functioning, wellbeing, and intrinsic motivation. The theory outlines three fundamental needs, namely autonomy, the necessity to feel that one is in control of his or her behaviour and that it is self-perceived and self-endorsed; competence, the need to feel capable of bringing desired results and of using his or her abilities; and relatedness, the necessity to feel that he or she has a connection with others, cares about them and is cared about, and belongs. SDT also differentiates between the different types of motivation on a continuum of amotivation, which implies the lack of intentionality, and different types of extrinsic motivation, which assume acting to achieve separable outcomes and finally intrinsic motivation, which implies engagement due to inherent contentment with the activity itself.   
Self-Determination Theory provides a sound conceptual framework in explaining the motivational mechanism that situates the choice of students to avail themselves with the opportunity of studying overseas and the choice of specific destinations in the case of international student mobility [31]. Available empirical studies which have utilised SDT in the context of international education reveal that students who choose to study abroad due to autonomous reasons i.e. an intrinsic interest in an object, personal values, and self-endorsed goals tend to be more satisfied, perform better academically and have better well-being as compared to those whose study-abroad decisions are based on controlled extrinsic reasons i.e. parental pressure or societal expectations. An integrative approach to the question of international students’ motivation to study abroad was investigated by Yue and colleagues who applied Expectancy-Value Theory and Self-Determination Theory simultaneously, and found out that both intrinsic motivation and satisfaction of the initial needs of a person were strong predictors of motivation to study abroad and further experience . This literature thus indicates the extreme importance of understanding not only the external factors which propel students towards certain destinations but also the internal motivational nature which can lead students to view themselves as having an autonomous choice as it can be in accordance with their true interests and values [4].   
The dimension of autonomy of Self-Determination Theory (SDT) is especially relevant to explain the destination choice of international students. Learners might experience a destination to provide more freedom of choice of courses and independent research, self-directed learning, and enforcing personal lifestyle choices, which are likely to make this destination more appealing to the learner. In the case of Indian students, who often have to struggle with complex family demands and social pressure on academic and career paths, the ability to exercise free will in a new cultural context can be an important pull factor. With a relatively flexible system of higher education and being in a tradition of European student-centred learning, the Czech Republic might therefore be attractive to students who want greater autonomy as compared to more constraining or prescriptive learning environments.  [31] 
The second pillar of the Self-Determination Theory (SDT) is competence, which deals with the perceptions of students regarding the likelihood of a potential study destination to help them achieve their selves through development of abilities, academic success, and enhancement of professional talents. The students are therefore predisposed to gravitate towards the destinations that they consider to be friendly to their academic thriving, acquisition of substantive knowledge and credentials as well as development of competency that will help them in their further professional activities. Empirical research studies indicate that perceptions about the quality of learning, prestige of the school, and access to learning resources and support facilities all have a cumulative effect on the sense of competence derivation in students in a particular environment. [7],[22] Regarding Indian students who are considering the Czech Republic, such variables as the quality of academic programmes, the reputation of the Czech universities in a certain field (particularly medicine and engineering), and the availability of research opportunities can be evaluated in terms of the analytic perspective of competence development.   
The third basic need that has been established in Self-Determination Theory (SDT) is called relatedness and explains the importance of being socially connected and having the sense of belonging. International students are faced with the challenge of forming new social networks under cultural milieu that are often located miles apart and unrelated to the family and support systems that have been formed. Places that are perceived to be warm, safe and supporting development of substantive interpersonal relationships are seen as being more attractive. The availability of an existing Indian community of students, the hospitality of the local communities, international exchange opportunities, and institutional provisions of international students all help to ease the relatedness needs. The role of social integration and support networks in influencing general satisfaction and academic achievements in international students is always emphasised in empirical research studies on the subject. A study in which the intentions of participants in the Erasmus+ programme were surveyed in terms of SDT demonstrated that needs associated with relatedness, in particular the need to connect with people and have cultural experiences, served as strong motivational factors in participating in the study abroad programmes. [27].   
A few empirical studies have used Self-Determination Theory to provide an examination on the motivation of international students and their choice of destination. On the theoretical framework of SDT, King and co-researchers discussed the importance of stimulation of intrinsic motivations in studying abroad by the allure of a destination. Their empirical research, performed by working with educational travelers in Paris, proved that destination appeal mediates the relationship between the context variables and intrinsic motivation, which presupposes that the role of destinations in enhancing autonomous decision-making of students can be achieved by providing information and minimising external control [29]. This finding has a major implication on understanding how the Czech Republic would place itself to appeal to intrinsically motivated Indian students.    
A different study by Muthuswamy and his colleagues has investigated the effect of self-determined motivation, and the goal orientations of international students on subjective wellbeing with goal satisfaction of psychological needs as mediating variable [28]. Though the particular population of the Indian learners or learners in the Czech Republic was not the target of this research, the outcome of this research shows that in the host setting when the primary psychological needs of the students are met, their self-determined motivation is linked with the increased well-being and general satisfaction. Therefore, the policy makers and universities in Czech need not merely focus on practical factors like tuition fees and the availability of programmes but also to create settings that can enable autonomy, competency, and relatedness of international students.   
The Self-Determination Theory applied to international student mobility requires a good distinction between autonomous and controlled motivation.  
Autonomous motivation is characterised by inherent motives to study abroad because of pure enjoyment and interest as well as well-assimilated extrinsic motives, when the activity of studying abroad is among the values and the long-term goals of an individual. In comparison, the controlled motivation is brought about by an outside force or the contingent reward or the internal drive like feeling guilty or anxious that drives to act. Empirical evidence has continually shown that autonomous motivation is associated with better academic perseverance, greater performance and better psychological health. In case with Indian students, the ability to identify whether the choice to study in the Czech Republic is individual or it is caused by external factors like parental demands or limited opportunities in the native country can reveal the anticipated level of satisfaction and academic performance [4], [31].   
The criticisms about the use of Self-Determination Theory in cross-cultural contexts have preempted questions about whether the three basic psychological needs postulated by the theory are universal or cultural-specific. Empirical studies suggest that the relative prominence of autonomy, competence and relatedness can, in turn, differ between cultural milieus; collectivist societies, in particular, are observed to assign higher levels of prominence to relatedness and smaller levels of prominence to autonomy compared to individualist societies[34],[35].  Although there is diversity, existing cross-cultural theory shows that these needs are mostly universal. At the same time, it recognizes that their expression and satisfaction can vary by culture. For Indian students, who come from a family-focused background where interdependence and group decision-making are often prioritized, the relationship between autonomy and relatedness is particularly complex. This intricacy explorations of how the notions of autonomy and relatedness experience the process of coming together with this demographic not only thought-provoking but also empirically necessary.   
Overall, the Self-Determination Theory offers a very insightful and detailed model when it comes to explaining the psychological decision-making that guides the selection of the Czech Republic as a study destination among Indian students. Exploring the perception of the Czech Republic in terms of autonomy, competence, and relatedness appeal, and differentiating among autonomous and controlled types of motivation, the researchers and practitioners are likely to get a better understanding of what is appealing to the Indian students in terms of this destination and how their experiences can be facilitated in order to meet their psychological needs and general well-being.  [34],[35] 

 3.1.2. Push-Pull Model in Student Mobility   
Building on the Push–Pull framework discussed earlier, the Push-Pull Model still is among the most used frameworks to explain the international mobility of students, which assumes that migration decisions are predetermined by a complex of the structural factors in the country of origin (push factors) and positive features of the country of destination (pull factors). 
Push factors in the Indian context entail restricted ability of the top institutions, high competition to join an institution, perceived inequality in the quality of education and limited availability of professional opportunities in some areas. Such structural constraints prompt students to seek other avenues of academic and career development by studying abroad. 
On the other hand, Czech Republic has some pull factors that are identifiable. These comprise relatively low tuition fees, reduced cost of living as compared to the Anglophone places of choice, the presence of English based programmes, recognised European degrees through the Bologna regime, and its strategic location in the European Union. Also, the image of safety, political stability, and the existence of the developing Indian student community makes it more attractive. 
Nevertheless, although the Push-Pull Model is useful in classifying structural determinants, the model has been faulted because it simplifies decision-making among students. Students do not receive what is imposed upon them but are proactive and mediated in their decisions by aspirations, social networks, and psychological forces. Because of this reason, the Push-Pull Model is most analytical in combination with models of motivation like Self-Determination Theory, which elucidates the interaction of structural influences with internal psychological requirements. 
Therefore, when Indian students select the Czech Republic, push factors will form the initial drive in the outward mobility, and the destination selection will be created by the pull factors. The outcome of the decision-making occurs between these situational forces and personal motivational orientations. 
[4], [31] 
3.2 Factors Influencing Study Abroad Destination Choice    
The choice in favour of studying abroad and the choice of a specific country of study depends on a complex of factors that may be grouped into the academic, economic, cultural-social and psychological aspects. Such variables neither work alone, but they interrelate in complex ways, and each of them presupposes various degrees of salience of individual students based on their circumstances, priorities, and values. A thorough explanation of these variables and their relative significance is necessary to explain the choice of the Indian students to the Czech Republic, and to come up with measures that can help make the destination more appealing and the support systems more powerful. [7], [13], [18]  
3.2.1. Academic Factors   
The academic factors are always present in literature as one of the most salient aspects of international students’ destination choice. These aspects include the standard of education, access to and applicability of degree courses, reputation of the institution, research facilities and the foreign acceptability of degrees. To students who put so much time, money, and effort in international education, academic qualifications and learning experiences that they expect to attain are the most important considerations[22].   
Curriculum rigor, pedagogical practices, learning materials, faculty credentials, student/faculty ratios, and the general standards of academic work are multidimensional constructs that make up the quality of education. Students want to visit places where they believe they will get high quality teaching which will provide them with knowledge, skills and competencies that are worth being in the global labor market. Gurucharan et al. (2019) used Fuzzy Analytical  
Hierarchical Process to priorities the determinants of international education destination among Indian students and listed the aspects of academic factors as one of the highest priorities, especially quality and reputation of educational institutions [7]. This observation is consistent with the general findings of other studies that have examined the mobility of international students and which have established that the perceived educational quality is one of the major attractors. [22]  
Availability of given academic programmes is another critical factor in selection of destinations to study. They are bound to be attracted to the areas that can provide them with the curricula that will support their academic activities and career goals. Medicine, engineering, business administration, computer science and natural sciences are some of the fields that are very popular among the Indian students especially. Czech Republic has developed skills in some of these areas, with the medical schools especially appealing to Indian students. Czech medical schools also offer English-taught MD programmes which are internationally recognized and allow licensure in a variety of jurisdictions. The contrast between such offerings with relatively lower tuition rates in comparison with Western medical training makes the Czech Republic a great option of future doctors who were born in India. [10], [16], [14]  
The institutional standing has a strong impact on the preferences of the destinations. Students and their families use university rankings, accreditation status and historical prestige to judge prospective hosts. Although Czech universities do not play as high profile in the international ranking as those in the United States or the United Kingdom, several Czech universities have strong regional reputations and well-established histories. Charles University, Czech Technical University, Masaryk University among others are recognized to make contributions to academics and therefore attract international enrolment. To Indian scholars, the reputation of the particular programme or department can be considered more significant than the overall rankings of universities particularly in specialized areas. [7], [22] 
Academic credentials are an important consideration which guarantee international recognition and mobility of the same. Students want to be sure that their qualifications will be recognised and that it will be appreciated not only in the host country but also in their home country and other jurisdictions where the students may seek employment. Students of the Czech Republic (and their degrees, especially those of reputable universities) are usually recognised throughout the European Union by the Bologna Process and the European Credit Transfer and Accumulation System. The validation of the Czech degree by the Indian authorities, both within and outside the country is a critical consideration to the Indian students. Empirical research on the preferences of Indian students towards studying abroad has shown that concerns over degree recognition and accreditation have a great impact on destination choice with the students preferring those places whose degrees are well established and generally recognized. [10].   
The ability to use faculty knowledge and available research opportunities is of utmost importance to graduate students and those who are enrolled in research-based programmes. Proximity to superior researchers, state of the art laboratories and the likelihood of contributing to state-of-the-art studies are very strong lures. The Czech universities in the research field show strong capacities in the spectrum 
of the research field, and the active participation of the country in European research networks and funding mechanisms, including Horizon Europe, gives Czech students a chance to be involved in the international joint research projects. To Indian students who have chosen the research career, these opportunities are even more alluring, especially when considered in take with the relatively cheaper cost of living, as compared to Western Europe [16].   
Language of instruction is a notable academic predictor of choice of destination in the study abroad. In the case of Indian learners, whose primary or secondary schooling is mostly conducted in English, the accessibility is critically determined by the provision of English-taught curricula. The Czech Republic has adjusted to the international demand through increasing the number of English based programmes at the master’s and doctorate levels in a variety of fields. Such development makes the Czech institutions more appropriate to Indian students who do not understand Czech. However, the differences in calibre and access to English-taught courses by different universities and disciplines might influence enrolment choices [13], [18].   
There is also influence of pedagogical methodologies. Students are attracted to those destinations which teaching methods are in line with their epistemic preferences and professional growth needs. Czech universities, which are a typical example of European institutions of higher learning, tend to anticipate critical inquiry, independent research and learner-based approaches to education, unlike the examination-based modalities of some Indian contexts. Such methodological deviations can be of special interest to the students who focus on the development of autonomy and competence as these concepts are conceptualized in the Self Determination Theory[4], [31] .   
The use of academic determinants in the selection of study-abroad is always emphasized by empirical literature. The study by Singh and colleagues determined that academic reputation and quality of the programmes are the most important in destination preferences of Indian business school students. Similarly, the study of motivational inclinations of international students, which occurs within the context of Expectancy Theory and Self-Determination Theory, found that academic expectations and value of educational outcomes is a significantly strong predictor of the intentions of study-abroad. The findings support the idea that, despite the power of financial, cultural, and other auxiliary factors, academic factors are critical in the decision process of most students [13], [4].   
Within the framework of the Czech Republic, to increase academic appeal, it is required to not only maintain but also to improve the level of instruction and successfully transfer this excellence to the potential Indian students. Specific outreach, reinforcement of curricular advantages, academic scholarship, research opportunities, graduate paths, and international certifications can bring Czech universities to the academic credibility level as an alternative.  
Furthermore, official partnerships with Indian organisations, participation in educational fairs in India as well as communication with academic consultants can be used to increase the knowledge about Czech higher-education opportunities among Indian students and their circles [16].   
3.2.2. Financial Factors   
One of the most salient as well as often decisive factors affecting the choice of destination by international students is the financial factor. The external cost of studying overseas is a significant investment to both the students and their families which includes the cost of tuition fees, cost of living, cost of travelling, cost of health insurance fees as well as other cost bones. To many Indian families, especially those in the middle-class bracket it is a financial strain, which involves a lot of careful budgeting, restrained savings building, and even borrowing of loan facilities to send one of their children abroad to pursue higher education. Thus, the relative price of a host country in comparison to the perceived standard and value of the educational product is a decisive factor of the student selection [7], [15], [16].  
There is a lot of variation in tuition fees depending on the destination and institutions. Conventional places like the United States and the United Kingdom are characterised by high tuition fees particularly among international scholars who are supposed to pay higher fees compared to their native colleagues. Conversely, several European jurisdictions such as Czech Republic offer relatively low-priced tuition models, most especially state universities. The tuition fees of English-taught programmes in the Czech Republic are relatively affordable when compared to those that exist in the 
Western European region and are significantly lower in comparison with the Anglophone destinations [13]. To give an example, annual enrolment fees at English-taught programmes in Czech state universities are generally between approx. 48.969.40 CZK to 367,270.50 CZK(€2,000 to €15,000), depending on the course and the level of study, unlike in the United Kingdom 367,270.50 CZK to 73.4541.00 (between €15,000 and €30,000) and in the United States 422 984,00 CZK to 1057460.00 CZK (between $20,000 and $50,000) [7]. This high-cost difference makes the Czech Republic a good alternative to the Indian students who want to pursue education in Europe at affordable cost.  
Another key financial factor is the cost of living. This group includes housing, food, transportation, energy and personal spending. The Czech nation, specifically, in the places beyond Prague, has a comparably low cost of living when compared to the Western European countries. Students can afford affordable housing and other day-to-day costs on food and transportation are moderate. Comparative research of student experiences among the European destinations has recorded that the Central and Eastern European countries tend to offer cheaper living costs, which forms a strong pull factor among international students who have their origin in the developing countries.[18] The promise of living a comfortable life at a small budget, as Indian students would do, and getting quality education in the Czech Republic is a significant positive attribute of the country to them.[3][8]  
The allowance of scholarships, grants, and other financial aid has the potential to have a significant impact on destination choice due to the ability to reduce the fiscal load. Although the Czech Republic does not offer international students such comprehensive scholarship programmes as in other countries, there are opportunities offered through Czech government scholarship schemes, institutional awards and European Union programmes. Moreover, some of the Indian students can become the beneficiaries of the scholarships based on Indian government programs or since the non-governmental funds. The apparentness and availability of these financial support options can have an impact on the perceived appeal of the Czech Republic. It has been established in previous studies that financial aid is a major destination determinant, especially amongst middle- and low-income-students. [13].   
All part-time work opportunities in the time of academic study are another cost factor of the would-be international students. The ability to work on a part-time basis can help to reduce living expenses, collect work experience as a professional, and develop transferable skills [19]. In the Czech Republic, foreign scholars have the right to work part-time if they are studying; this depends on the statutory restrictions about the amount of time that they are allowed to work per week and the type of work. The concentration of part-time jobs, current wage levels, and the availability of local labor market all informed students with respect to the financial choices. To Indian students, a viable opportunity to earn income at the same time increases the cost efficiency of a selected destination [20].  
The employment opportunities after graduation and the corresponding payback is another more distant, yet not less important, financial aspect. Families and students determine the worth of the capital invested in international education in terms of corresponding career paths and income. Destinations that allow them easy career access, either in the host country or internationally speaking, and which provide graduates with high rates of remuneration are inherently more appealing in a financial context. Membership in European Union provides the Czech Republic with a lifetime prospect of having graduates enter the wider European labour market; however, the language barriers and work permit legislation can act against non-EU citizens. [30]The findings of empirical research on the reasons and then limits of Indian students to study in foreign countries proves that the expectant career advantages and estimated returns on investment are crucial factors defining destinations [19] [30].  
The final worth of any educational undertaking depends on the connexon between cost and perceived quality, and it provides the general value proposition. Stakeholders conduct implicit or explicit cost benefit analyses on a regular basis, weighed by the cumulative monetary expenditures against projected academic, professional, and personal rewards [16]. The competitive edge that the Czech Republic has is that it provides a good value proposition, namely European education, which has gained the respect of the whole world, but at a fraction of the price that the usual destinations command. This niche is especially strong in the middle-class Indian families that are trying to afford their children international education and face serious financial limitations that make more expensive options unsustainable [15].  
Empirical research always emphasizes the critical importance of financial aspects in destination choice of higher education. According to a Structural Equation Modelling analysis using global student mobility initiatives in Indian institutions of higher learning, fiscal variables, that is, cost and accessibility of financial aid, played a key role in determining mobility decisions among students [16]. In conducting focused studies on the desires of Indian students towards studying abroad, the tuition fees and cost of living were found to be among the greatest factors, often second only to academic standards [7], [13]. Comparative studies of Indian student mobility to the European countries also revealed that cost-effectiveness was the factor that formed the main force behind the increasing trend towards European destinations as the alternative to the more costly Anglophone countries [9], [11].  
The financial aspect is something that cannot be detached to a wider range of influences. As an example, the cost-effectiveness of a host nation can serve as a means of access to students with a wide range of socio-economic backgrounds and this in turn can bring more diversity and inclusion to the academic world [5]. Furthermore, financial stress may negatively influence academic achievement, personal health, and general satisfaction, making affordability a decisive variable, which goes beyond accessibility to academic performance and experiences quality [28].  
The Czech Republic is noteworthy for its financial benefits, which are crucial in the marketing and recruitment of the country. Clearing information about tuition fees, cost of living, availability of scholarships, and part-time working environments can enable the potential Indian students and their families to make informed choices. Offering detailed financial planning software, cost-calculation applications, and the testimonies of already existing Indian students who successfully manage the financial management in the Czech Republic can only enhance the destination appeal even more. Therefore, the creation of scholarship programmes that are directly focused on Indian students would likely cement the competitive position of the Czech Republic and would draw extremely successful scholars who may seek more expensive options [10].   
3.2.3. Cultural and Social Factors   
The cultural milieu, social integration processes, language dynamics, perceptions of safety, patterns of lifestyle and the presence of support networks in the host country are cultural and social variables. Such variables play a significant role in the choice of the destination as well as future experiences, level of satisfaction, and academic performance of students at the destination. To international researchers, moving to a new country will require the need to negotiate new cultural standards, form new social relationships and adapt to different lifestyle norms, which are both enriching and at the same time, a source of difficulty.[5]  
The extent of cultural similarity or dissimilarity between the two home and host countries acts as a multiplexed determinant. Cultural congruence may be used to enhance the adaptation and reduce the culture shock thereby making culturally similar destinations more desirable [6]. On the other hand, the cultural difference can appeal to students who want to experience something new, self-grow, and internally master the practice of cross-cultural competence. The Czech Republic is a very different place in the circumstances of Indian scholars, where European customs, value systems, and social conventions are strongly prominently different when compared to India. The cultural difference thus created can be a challenge as well as an incentive based on the motivation and ability to adjust to it [30].  
The study of the experience of international students proves that cultural adjustment is a significant issue that affects performance and academic success, as well as psychological wellbeing and general satisfaction. [6] Formal research studies on intercultural transitions in postsecondary education have focused on both the processes of adjustment and adapting to cultural differences, establishing that students who successfully go through the transition and develop intercultural competence experience fewer negative experiences more often [6]. Using the example of Indian students studying in the Czech Republic, the facilitative factors can include organized orientation programmes, specific intercultural training, and cultural exchange experience, which would lead to the increased attractiveness of the country and to the academic success of students.[6]  
Language is one of the defining cultural and functional determinants. Even though the Czech higher education sector has a significant number of English-taught programmes, the Czech language continues to dominate in terms of the everyday communication. The low level of English speaking among the local population beyond the big cities is also an obstacle among the international students as it influences their performance concerning daily task execution, utilization of services, interaction with locals and complete assimilation of the Czech society. On the other hand, linguistic diversity can be considered as a valuable resource by students that view language acquisition as a chance to improve personally(1), [30]. There have been empirical studies that have found that language barrier is a usual challenge when it comes to Indian students in European destinations, but students tend to adapt to this issue over time and can even consider language acquisition a beneficial skill.  
One of the most important issues for international students and their family members is safety and security. Conceptions about security include physical security which includes low rates of crime and lack of violent and aggressive acts, political stability and guard against discrimination or harassment. The Czech Republic is generally considered as a safe country with the low level of crime and the stable political situation in the country, thus presenting a great attraction to the potential newcomers. To the Indian parents making decisions about their children in terms of overseas studies, the question of safety often comes into the limelight as a major concern. Cases of hostility, bigotry, or intimidation against international students in some nations have contributed to safety concern and changing the choice of destinations. The results have shown that the opinions of safety have a significant impact on the destination choice, which pushes students and families to actively search the information about the crime rates, political situation, and the attitude toward foreign students [18].  
The presence of an Indian diaspora or a student body in a host nation is a relevant social variable. The existing groups of Indians also provide social support, cultural understanding, exchange of information, and networking opportunities to newcomers. These communities may help in easy transitions, reduce sense of isolation, and offer practical support in relation to accommodation, orientation and cultural adjustment. The large population of Indian students that is increasingly taking shape in the Czech Republic, especially in the metropolis cities like Prague and Brno, acts as a desirable pull factor to the other successful students. Social network and student mobility studies have proved that co-national communities play a very important role in destination choice and facilitating the accommodation process. (2)   
Students need to feel related and belong to the surrounding community, which social integration and the friendliness of the local population can bring (in SDT terms). The places that are considered as cordial and receptive to international students are more desirable. It is important for students to have a chance to connect with local ones, make cross-cultural friends and be accepted in their host countries. Studies have been done on the satisfaction of international students, and it is always observed that social integration is a major factor of overall satisfaction and well-being [23]. In the case of the Czech Republic, making campus life more inclusive, facilitating intercultural interaction, and turning to local students to encourage their interaction with international ones will help the country improve socialization and the general experience of the students.   
The quality of life has different elements such as climate, urban setting, recreational facilities, healthcare, transport, and the general way of life. Czech Republic has the high quality of life and the well-developed infrastructure, public transportation, available healthcare, and cultural and recreational opportunities. Prague is especially the city of historical beauty, of colorful culture, of cosmopolitan ambiance. In the case of students, the factors of quality-of-life lead to overall satisfaction and wellbeing, and, thus, destinations with high quality of life are more appealing. Student mobility studies have revealed that lifestyle issues are important during destination selection and satisfaction although in some cases secondary to academic and monetary factors [29].   
Other social and cultural factors that are relevant are geographic location and travel opportunities. The central European location of Czech Republic allows easy access to other European states thus students can travel, learn about other people and join pan-European networks [18] . To the Indian students, the possibility of visiting several European countries during study is a bonus that becomes value-adding to the learning process. It is a pull factor, as this geographic advantage is more European destinations compared to the geographically more isolated alternatives [20].   
The status of studying in Europe, cultural capital, may also affect destination choice. To several Indian students and parents, studying in Europe undertakings come with social status and cultural capital that helps in boosting the profile of the student and family prestige. The fact that it is related to European culture, history, and intellectual traditions can be attractive, despite the fact that the country (the Czech Republic) in question may not be as recognizable as more ancient places of sightseeing [20]. This is the symbolic aspect of destination choice that is hard to measure yet it does play an important role in determining tastes and decisions.  
 The empirical research has given much importance to the factors of culture and social influence in determining the mobility of international students. An examination of the reasons and limitations of Indian students moving to foreign countries has also shown that the cultural variables including the quest to achieve cultural exposure and the cultural issues that concern cultural adaptation played a major role in determining the destination choice [19]. A study of the experiences of international students in Latvia, a Central European destination with some similarities to the Czech Republic, has identified cultural factors and the overall appeal of the region as the major driving force behind the 
Indian students [30]. Another research article on student Kerala to European migration also 
highlighted the significance of socio-economic status and cultural assimilation in defining the experiences and satisfaction rate of students [2].   
The interaction between the cultural determinants and the Self-Determination Theory (SDT) seems to be extremely salient. The settings, which encourage autonomy, create access to competence development, and support relatedness, will probably become more desirable and supportive to positive learning results [34]. To Indian students who have to manage the contradictions between traditional values emphasizing the interdependence of the family and the values of the West that are often associated with individualism, Czech environment, with its blend of European and Central-European traditions, could offer a unique place of identity formation and personal growth [35].    
In the Czech Republic, the multifaceted approach is required to deal with cultural and social determinants. The acculturation and integration can be facilitated by augmenting support mechanisms that include orientation programmes, language training, cultural integration programmes and psychosocial counselling of international scholars [5]. The possibility of facilitating intercultural interactions will help bridge the cultural differences and build the platforms where students of Indian and Czech heritage will be able to exchange their insights [6]. To attract and retain international talent the campus and the areas near the campus should be inclusive, non-discriminatory, and conducive. In addition, its attractiveness due to the cultural richness, safety, quality of life, and the presence of a supportive Indian student community can be enhanced through effective communication of such factors, which will increase the prospects of attracting new enrolments to the country [30].   
3.2.4. Psychological Factors   
Continuing the Self-Determination Theory (SDT) model described above, psychological motivations are one of the critical determinants of destination preferences of international students. Instead of restating the theoretical basis, the current section analyses how the notions of autonomy, competence, and relatedness are operationalized when it comes to Indian students who chose the Czech Republic as the study destination.   
Autonomy is also displayed through the desires of students to become independent and have agency over their lives and be free of home-country academic or social restrictions. To many Indian academics, international education presents the opportunity of self-authorizing learning options and pursuing independent existence. The European academic system of the Czech Republic, combined with a student-focused pedagogical atmosphere, is sure to appeal to people who want to have more control in their academic and personal career.   
Competence is linked with the judgments of academic quality, skill training and employability among the students. The decisions to study in the Czech Republic can be influenced by the anticipations of high education, education accredited internationally, and opportunities to expand professional skills. The perceived academic rigor and accessibility of research infrastructure directly predetermine perceived competence and preparedness of students to work on global labor markets.   
Relatedness entails the internal desire of belonging and substantive social relations. The presence of a recognized group of Indian students, attitudes towards security, and integrative institutional environments can have a significant impact on choice of destination. Students will be more likely to report high levels of satisfaction and psychological adaptation when they expect to be integrated into society and accepted by the culture.   
Besides, long-term outcomes are influenced by the quality of motivation an autonomous or extrinsically regulated motivation. Students whose choice is aligned with internal objectives and personal goals tend to have a greater level of satisfaction and well-being than those whose choices are aimed at the external factors and which are caused by family influence or status issues.   
In the framework of the mobility of Indian students to the Czech Republic, SDT provides a useful analytical tool that can be used to explain the relationship of the psychological needs and structural pull factors. As a result, the attractiveness of Czech Republic cannot be associated with only economic or academic advantages, but also with the ability to promote the autonomy of students, their competence development, and social adaptation. 
3.3. Indian Students in International Higher Education   
India has become one of the most important source countries of international students in the world with hundreds of thousands of Indian nationals enrolling into institutions of higher learning in other countries every year [33]. This section provides a critical assessment of the trends and the pattern of Indian student mobility, the motivation factors driving Indian students into foreign education and the obstacles they face in the foreign academic set ups [2]. The subtle understanding of the contextual peculiarities of the Indian student mobility is what is required to divide the factors that predetermine both the reasons and the methods by which the Indian students choose the very specific destinations, and the Czech Republic is not an exception [20].   
3.3.1. Trends and Patterns of Indian Student Mobility   
The movement of Indian students has been growing at an unprecedented pace during the past twenty years and has become the result of a combination of demographic, economic and educational factors [2]. India has the highest number of youth population in the world with millions of learners finishing their secondary schooling every year seeking tertiary education opportunities [33]. However, the Indian ability of the higher education system, though large in absolute sense, is not sufficient to satisfy this vast demand of high-quality education. It is this incessant lack of supply and demand coupled with rising ambitions and increasing accessibility of education by the growing middle classes of India, which has led to the motivating wave of students to foreign universities [19].    
Empirical data based on the ICEF Monitor and various national repositories show that the count of 
Indian students in foreign countries has increased since the beginning of the 2000s by approximately 200,000 up to the present days with over 750,000 students being the second top source of international students in the world, only after China. [33]Although the COVID-19 pandemic had caused a momentary halt in such flows of movement, the restoration of normalcy has been strong, and it is expected to keep growing in the coming annum.    
The Indian students have traditionally shown high tendencies towards the Anglophone destinations, and this includes the United States, the United Kingdom, Canada, and Australia. These countries have been receiving most of the Indian international scholars, because of the status of their universities, the dominance of the English medium of instruction, the strong networks of the Indian diaspora, as well as the feeling of better career opportunities [20]. The US is the most predominant destination as it accepts large populations of Indian students especially in the STEM fields at graduate level. The United Kingdom is also a large hub particularly of the master programmes. In Canada and Australia, the growth of Indian enrolments has been faster in the recent past due to permissive immigration policies and procurement of permanent residency.   
Nonetheless, the last years have been characterized by a significant diversification of preferences in destination among Indian students. There are several factors which are intertwined that have brought about this shift. First, the rising of the cost and to a greater extent tightening of immigration policies at the old destinations especially the United States and the United Kingdom have made students to consider other mobility opportunities [33]. Secondly, the increased knowledge about learning opportunities in non-traditional destinations, through digital information sources and professionalism of the educational consultant, has widened the scope of admissible options by prospective students [2]. Third, the internationalization policies embraced by universities in other countries such as active recruitment campaigns towards India have increased the visibility and appeal of the alternative destinations [7]. Fourth, geopolitical factors, including fear of safety and discrimination and unpredictability of visa policies in some traditional destinations, have also influenced the preferences of students and moderated them.  
This diversification has been a blessing to European countries. Germany, France, the  
Netherlands, and even Central European and Eastern European nations such as Czech Republic,  Poland, Hungary, etc., have been receiving more Indian students. A study conducted by Mukherjee and others focused on the movement of Indian students to European countries of choice namely Germany and France and reported the drivers behind this trend [9], [11]. This paper established that these countries were becoming more and more appealing to Indian students due to the combination of good education, cheaper rates than the Anglophone destinations, and opportunities within the European Union.   
The Czech Republic is an emerging destination. Although it is still not drawing Indian student numbers equivalent to Germany or UK, in the last 10 years, the number of Indian students enrolling in Czech universities has been steadily increasing [2]. This has been most evident in certain areas like medicine whereby the Czech medical schools have aggressively taken in Indian students, and in engineering and business courses. The existence of an existing community of Indian students in such cities as Prague and Brno has resulted in creating the network effects that lead to the further growth [38].  
The trends of Indian student migration depend on the sphere of study, the level of study and socioeconomic status. Indian students studying in foreign countries at the undergraduate level are often concentrated in the engineering, Computer science and Business programmes. Graduate level mobility in contrast is more heterogeneous in its distribution of disciplines with an intense representation in STEM, business administration, the social sciences, and humanities.[2] Medicine is a unique scenario where a good percentage of Indian students are studying medical degrees abroad and particularly in countries where the admission standards are relatively lower and the cost of tuition is lower compared to India. Indicatively, the Czech Republic has been identified to be a specifically successful place to recruit Indian medical students [10].  
Academic level patterns show that the greatest percentage of Indian international students is enrolled in master programmes, bachelor’s and then doctoral programmes. One-year master programmes that are common in the United Kingdom have become especially popular. On the other hand, the Czech master programmes (normally two years long) are aligned with the European standards and allow students a longer educational period [7].  
In a socio-economic dimension, most of the Indian international students belong to middle and uppermiddle-income families that have the financial resources to finance foreign education. However, recent developments are characterized by a growing amount of heterogeneity, as students in smaller urban centers and low-income families also study abroad, often through scholarship programmes or by choosing less expensive destinations. Empirical studies on migration of middle-class Indian students have highlighted the contribution of aspirations, family strategies and agents of intermediary recruitment in shaping the mobility pattern. [14].   
The trends in the gender structure of Indian student mobility have been changing over the last several decades, as there is a clearly observable key change in the ratio of female subjects getting involved in studying abroad; however, most of the representatives remain male. Traditionally, the culture setting, the parental fears related to the safety, and the established gender role patterns have restricted the freedom of movement of a woman [20]. The fact that these barriers are gradually on the decline can be seen through evolving social perceptions, and the recorded success of female scholars in other countries to show the real potential of such ventures and their viability and feasibility in a logistically sound manner [29].  
There is also geospatial difference that has an impressive effect on India. The states with high levels of economic development, higher educational levels, and increased exposure to international opportunities are the most significant contributors of students in foreign academic programmes. Maharashtra, Delhi, Karnataka, Tamil Nadu, Telangana and Kerala become crucial source states. The empirical research concerning the migration of the Kerala students to Europe has traced the select dynamics that pertain to this regional flux, including the contribution of the dissatisfaction with the quality of education in the home country, and the facilitation of the process that is provided by the already existing migration networks. [2].   
The impact of the intermediaries, especially the educational consultants and recruitment agents, has a significant effect on the trend of Indian student mobility. A large number of the Indian students rely on these consultants to guide them on the complex procedures of university selection, application preparation, visa application, and logistics. These intermediaries hold significant influence on destination preferences thus guiding the student flows on the destinations to particular countries or institutions due to their affiliations and commissioning structures, as well as area of specialisation. Studies have also established significant differences in quality of consultancy services and moral principles of services offered by educational consultancies, which means that some companies may offer worthwhile consultancy, whereas others perform activities leading to misguidance. [12].   
Such trends and patterns would be critical in putting into perspective the decisions of Indian students in relation to the Czech Republic. The Czech Republic is placed as an alternative to the traditional Anglophone alternatives and other European alternatives, which can provide a unique blend of quality, cost, location in Europe and particular programme advantages. Its growth as an Indian student destination indicates broader general diversification and value-seeking in overseas education[12].   
3.3.2 Motivations and Challenges Faced by Indian Students Abroad   
Push factors in India and pull factors in the countries of immigration, as well as personal preferences and family planning strategies, are all part of the intricate and multifaceted incentives that lead Indian students studying abroad to pursue higher education [19]. An excellent grasp of these motivation forces will provide knowledge of the expectations held by the Indian students in regard to international education and the way that the destinations like Czech Republic can meet the requirements [4].   
	I. 	Academic and Educational Motivations   
The main reason why the Indian students opt to study overseas is the search of better standard of learning that is perceived to be better or unique compared to education offered in India. Even though higher education in India is a large system, there are concerns about the quality of academic work, outdated curriculums, lack of infrastructure and limited research prospects in many institutions and this is driving students to overseas options. The causes of Indian international students not joining master programmes in their native country were examined in an empirical study by Chanda et al. and the analysis revealed that perceived loss in quality, limited specialization, and the research facilities were critical inhibitory factors [15]. The desire to learn under outstanding talents, use state of the art facilities, engage in innovative research and an education both relevant around the globe and compliant to international standards drive such scholars.    
This is an extra push because specialized academic programmes concentrations are either not offered or not well-developed in India. As an example, those students who want niche engineering major, interdisciplinary programmes, or medical specialization might find greater opportunities in the foreign market [4]. In addition, the presence of English-taught courses in non-English speaking countries, as is the case in the Czech Republic, eliminates a language barrier and also allows access to various educational philosophies and points of view at the same time.  
	II. 	Career and Economic Motivations   
Professional growth and improved job opportunities are major reasons that make a good percentage of Indian students pursue education in foreign countries. The international degree, especially a degree of a well reputed institution, is seen to enhance the employability of the individual, the availability of better job opportunities and a better pay not only in India but also in other parts of the world. Indeed, empirical research findings clearly show a career consideration as one of the most important motivators among Indian international students [7], [13],[19].  Many students argue that studying in another country provides them with valuable skillsets, valid credentials and broadening their networks, giving them advantages in finding jobs after graduation. The ability to gain international work experience by means of work placements during their study or through work after graduation is a very strong motivating factor for students to study in another country. In addition, studying outside of India gives students an opportunity to either support their desire to obtain international employment, or to build international professional experience, which will ultimately return to India with additional credentials and valuable exposure. Students who go to countries which provide poststudy work visas and a route to permanent residency through their work experience are especially interested in studying abroad for these reasons. There is an economic rationale behind the investment in education overseas with respect to increasing lifetime wages after graduation; as such, many families view investing in their child's education as a way to obtain a large return on their investment through better employment opportunities and higher earnings. This financial incentive often has a tremendous impact on middle-class families that are sacrificing a significant amount of money to pay for their student's education outside of India.  
III. 	Personal and Developmental Motivations   
Beyond the standard education and career objectives, there is a significant percentage of Indian students who are motivated by the idea of self-advancement. Many students imagine studying abroad as a way to achieve personal growth, increasing their independence, maturing and self-discovery. To young adults who are in the transitional stage to adulthood, living independently in a foreign country, facing new challenges and being in charge of their own lives is a critical encounter with development. Empirical studies supported by the Self-Determination Theory have reported that motives related to autonomy and self-development are important factors that define the choice to study overseas. [4], [29].   
Cultural exposure and desire to experience different cultures and their ways of living and thinking are some of the influencing factors driving many students. The likelihood of travelling, learning about other different societies, developing intercultural competence, and broadening world view is not only treasured but also in terms of a professional benefit in a highly globalized environment [4].  To some students, adventure and excitement of living in a foreign country is a motivating factor.  
	IV. 	Social and Family Motivations   
There is also a factor of familial expectations and the social culture pressure, which motivates the Indian students to attend overseas education. In most Indian families, especially the families of the middle and upper-middle social groups, foreign education is very valued and interpreted as the measure of personal achievement and status. Parents often have significant expectations of their children to study abroad and can have a strong level of control in the decision-making process. Empirical studies have reported that even though there are learners making independent decisions on studying abroad, others are coerced into a strong form of family influence that could undermine the quality of their motivation and influence future academic and sociocultural engagements. (2), [19].   
There is a significant impact of peer and social network dynamics. When the familiar, family members or local people take up study abroad and they see positive reports, these experiences create aspirational intentions and provide operational intelligence that facilitates the processes of decision making that are ancillary. With the introduction of social media and online communication platforms, these network-mediated phenomena have become even more acute such that data relating to overseas academic activities becomes more accessible and visible [19].   
	V. 	Challenges Faced by Indian Students Abroad   
As much as there are many opportunities in studying abroad, Indian students face a lot of challenges which affect their experiences and their results. The need to understand these challenges is essential in ensuring that the host destinations including Czech Republic can develop effective support mechanisms [6].  
VI. 	Academic Challenges 
The students of India might face academic problems regarding the dissimilarity between the educational systems, pedagogical methods, and institutional requirements of the Indian context. The transition to a Western-style of education based on discussion and critical thinking as opposed to an examination-driven and content-based curriculum is usually a major challenge. Although the programmes are carried out in English, it is possible that the language barriers hinder the understanding and participation. Empirical research has revealed that academic adjustment is a common problem amongst foreign students and requires premeditated time and institutional coverage. [6].   
VII. 	Financial Challenges 
Although a high level of planning is done, a good percentage of Indian students have been subjected to financial pressure during their studies in foreign countries. The cost of international education, even in relatively low-cost countries of residence, is a significant cost. Unpredictability in the exchange rates, unplanned spending, and limited financial capabilities may cause stress, thus affecting the wellness and academic performance of students [15]. Also, time constraints associated with the need to work part-time to make ends meet have a negative impact on academic activity [28].  
VIII. 	Cultural and Social Challenges:  
Among the most faced challenges faced by the Indian students studying in foreign countries, cultural adaptation and social integration have been reported. These people have to overcome some unknown cultural norms, social behaviors and ways of communicating and this results in culture shock, homesickness and sensation of being isolated especially at the first months of their overseas placement. The process of creating new social networks and developing significant relationships within an international setting may be laborious, particularly in the cases when language barriers are present, or domestic students have the tendency to avoid interacting with international students. Empirical studies of intercultural transition have placed on record, the numerous aspects of cultural adjustment, the aspects that favour effective adaptation, and those that hamper effective adjustment.[6] [30].   
IX. 	Discrimination and Safety Concerns 
Some of the Indian students might face discrimination, racism, or harassment in their new places of residence and this can significantly affect their wellbeing and belonging. The cases of violence or discrimination of international students as witnessed in different countries create safety fears that could discourage potential students. Empirical data shows that satisfaction and perceptions of safety and discrimination are essential factors that determine the satisfaction of international students in choosing a destination. [18], [30].   
	X. 	Psychological and Mental Health Challenges 
The combination of academic pressures, economic complexity, problems with adapting to the culture, and social isolation significantly influence the mental wellbeing of international students. This population is subject to anxiety, depressive symptoms and chronic stress.[23] [6] Often mental-health services and culturally informed counseling are not accessible, which only increases such issues. Modern studies are becoming increasingly convinced that the psychological health of international learners should be taken care of to achieve academic success and general satisfaction.  [28].   
XI. 	Visa and Immigration Challenges 
The visa processes, adherence to immigration policies, and victimization of uncertainties about employment opportunities available after graduation or the host country status are the factors that create psychological stress and erode the perceived security and long-term planning among the students (2). Alterations on immigration policy, particularly restrictive ones, can cause apprehension and reduce the appeal of a destination [20].   
XII. 	Family Separation and Responsibilities 
The distance between the family members, especially in time of significant family occasions or a crisis, is an emotionally difficult process to many Indian students. Besides, a percentage of students who face demands to support relatives or relatives are expected to support them financially, which will lead to the emergence of conflicts between personal career ambitions or the urge to obtain international experience and family demands.    
These problems have been recorded through research studies specifically aimed at the experiences of Indian students in other countries. Research on the reasons and limitations of Indian students moving to foreign countries revealed that although the students were driven by the prospects of education and employment, they also faced a lot of challenges related to cultural adjustment, money, and separation with their families [19]. A study done on Indian students in most European destinations has enlightened on not only the opportunities that such students have but also on the challenges they face, hence the need to have supportive systems and inclusive environments. [2], [30].   
In the case of Czech Republic, the understanding of these motivations and challenges is a condition to the development of effective recruitment strategies and supportive services. The marketing efforts should highlight how the institutions of higher education in the Czech Republic can address the academic, professional, and personal growth goals of the Indian students, and at the same time alleviate the cost, safety, and institutional support concerns.[10] Moreover, the support services should be designed to enable a smooth process of academic acculturation, cultural assimilation, social integration and psychological well-being hence recognizing the unique needs and challenges faced by the Indian students [5].   
3.4 Czech Republic as a Study Destination   
Over the past two decades, the Czech Republic has become a very appealing destination by international students including the Indian ones [39]. This section focuses on an introduction to the system of Czech higher-education and considers the specific features that make Czech Republic attractive to international scholars and specifically examines other factors that impact destination decisions among Indian students [20].  
3.4.1 Overview of Czech Higher Education System   
The Czech higher education system has a rich and long history, some of the universities can be tracked to the mediaeval times. Charles University formed in 1348 is one of the oldest and flagship universities in Europe. Modern Czech higher education system was adjusted after the Velvet Revolution of 1989 and the following democratization and adoption of a market economy in the country. Later reforms in the 2000s occurred to harmonies the system with European standards via the Bologna Process which introduced a three-cycle system of degrees (bachelor, master, doctoral) and encouraged movement and recognition throughout European systems of higher learning [40].  
The system of higher education in the Czech Republic consists of state universities, private universities and public universities. Most of the institutions are public universities that are mostly state-supported and include the most prestigious universities [41]. The programmes that are provided in these universities cover a great spectrum of subjects, such as humanities, social sciences, natural sciences, engineering, medicine, and arts. Private universities that have grown in number since 1990s are more likely to specialize in each subject including business, law, and social sciences. State universities are also specialized universities which are dedicated to subjects like military and police education [41].  
Traditionally, tuition-free studies in the Czech language are offered in Czech universities to international students by the Czech state. The programmes offered in foreign languages, which are mainly English programmes are however normally charged. This two-tier system enables foreign students willing and able to pursue their studies in Czech to enjoy free education, and those who prefer programmes in English pay fees which although substantial, tend to be lower as compared to the fees in Western European states or other Anglophone destinations [41].  
Bologna Process has helped Czech higher education to become internationalized. Czech universities have proliferated English programmes especially at the master and doctoral degrees to allow the entry of international students and increase their global image. European Credit Transfer and Accumulation System (ECTS) facilitate recognition of credit and free flow of students in institutions in Europe. The universities in Czech embrace the European exchange programmes like Erasmus+ that attract students studying in other European nations on temporary basis [41], [42].  
The quality assurance of higher education in the Czech Republic is conducted by the National Accreditation Bureau that conducts systematic examination and accreditation of study programmes and institutions. Though the Czech universities are not strategically placed in the world ranking that is normally dominated by Anglophone institutions, some of them have strong reputations, especially in certain fields of discipline. In particular, the best examples include Charles University, Czech Technical University in Prague, Masaryk University in Brno, and Palacky University in Olomouc that can attract a significant number of international students [41], [42].   
The Czech higher education system has very strong focus on research, particularly at the doctoral stage and Czech universities are members of European research networks and funding opportunities. This research orientation gives the graduate students the chance to participate in research projects, financial aid, and even cooperate with the scholars of the international community [41], [42].   
3.4.2 Attractiveness for International Students   
The attractiveness of the Czech Republic is a destination country to international higher education students, especially the ones with an Indian background, can be explained by a shooting-star of academic, financial, geographic, cultural, and pragmatic aspects. The interpretation of these traits provides explanatory information about the choice of the Indian scholars and help to explain the competitive positioning of the Czech Republic in comparison with other available locations [7].  
	I. 	Academic Quality and Program Availability   
The institutions of higher education in Czech offer quality education in a wide range of fields with specific strong sides in such areas as medicine, engineering, natural sciences and arts.  Czech academic sphere is credited and prestigious by the long-standing academic tradition of such institutions like Charles University.  To the student nationals of India, the availability of the English-taught programmes consistent with their interests makes a determinant factor in their institutional selection.  The number of courses available in English taught in Czech universities has also increased and especially medicine, engineering, business, and computer science, which have gained much popularity among Indian students [43].  One of the weaknesses and the main draw is medical education. The Czech Republic offers six-year programmes of the Doctor of medicine which are taught in English and are recognized internationally, such as the accreditation of medical councils in India, in the United States and other jurisdictions.  A combination of high-quality medical education and relatively low tuition fees compared to medical schools in the Western countries or even to the Indian and other privately run medical colleges in India has made the Czech Republic a favorite destination among potential physicians of India and other countries. A study conducted on student migration of Kerala to Europe has particularly mentioned the Czech Republic as a medical study destination. [2].   
	II. 	Financial Affordability   
Indian students are extremely cost-conscious, as it is mentioned in in Section 3.2.2 the Czech  
Republic offers significant cost-efficiencies. The cost of tuition at English-taught courses at Czech state universities traditionally lies between the price of two thousand and fifteen thousand a year, depending on the programme and the level. This is a significant decrease compared to tuition fees in the United Kingdom (around £15.000-£30.000), the United States (about $20.000-$50.000) and some states in Western Europe. Regarding life costs, the Czech Republic, particularly the areas outside Prague city, remain relatively low in terms of cost of living as compared to the rest of Western Europe. Students can afford cheap housing, and the daily spending to food, transportation, and recreation are affordable. The low cost of Czech Republic makes it affordable to middle-income Indian families who would want to provide their children with European education but cannot afford more expensive countries. The fact that European education, which has international awareness, could be acquired at a fraction of the price of the traditional destinations is a very salient repelling force [15].  III. 	Geographic Location and European Access   
The geographic location of the Czech Republic is central Europe, which is a strategic opportunity. The state lies centrally on the European continent, thereby granting easy access to other European countries hence giving the students the opportunity to travel, experience different cultures with others, and create pan-European networks. The fact that a student of Indian origin will have the prospect of visiting several European countries during their academic programme will add significant weight to the learning process and will make this an attractive offer.[44]  
Being a country of the European Union and Schengen Area, Czech Republic grants students the access to the larger European area. Non-EU students do not face unrestrained opportunities; however, they usually have the right to move freely within the Schengen Zone throughout their study, which simplifies the integration into the local culture and the establishment of professional contacts. Besides, the EU membership will mean that the degrees earned in the Czech Republic will be recognized throughout the EU, which can make those degrees more emblazoned or allow to study in other European jurisdictions [44].  
IV. 	Safety and Quality of Life   
Czech Republic is an area that is safely considered to be a safe country with low crime rates, stable political situation and a high standard of living. In the case of Indian parents and students who value the aspect of safety, especially in the backdrop of the reported cases of violence or discrimination of international students in other countries, the image of the country being a safe place serves as a powerful pull factor. It ranks well in a number of quality-of-life indicators, with strong healthcare, good transport infrastructure, clean environment and strong culture [41], [44].  
The capital of Prague is acclaimed to have an ancient aesthetic, dynamic culture and a cosmopolitan atmosphere. It is always in the list of the most beautiful cities in Europe and offers a high standard of life with the combination of antique and contemporary facilities. The other Czech neighborhoods like Brno, Olomouc and Plzen also have favorable living conditions with cheaper prices and warmer communal environment [30].  
	V. 	Cultural Richness and European Experience   
Czech Republic is a country that boasts of a rich cultural heritage, including historical architecture, museums, theatres, music, and the fine arts. To the students who are fascinated with European culture and history, this country offers a detachable academic experience. The cultural specificity of Western and Eastern Europe due to its location as the center of the intersection of these cultures gives it a certain cultural trait that synthesizes the elements of various European cultures.    
The opportunity to explore the unique European lifestyle, which is contrasted with social and cultural backgrounds of the countries of India and Anglophone countries, can be interesting to the students who seek personal development and intercultural competence. [21]Even though the cultural difference might be a challenge, it also presents learning and development opportunities.  
VI. 	Presence of Indian Student Community   
The growing population of Indian students studying in Czech universities particularly in metro cities like Prague and Brno creates network effects that bring about further growth of the population group. The established communities of Indian students provide the essential social support and exchange of information, as well as a familiarity of the culture to the new students. The work of Indian student associations, holding cultural events and working of informal networks all facilitate the adjustment process and alleviate the sense of isolation. Empirical studies have always shown that the existence of co-national communities is a major factor that determines the destination selection and the successful accommodation. , [30].   
VII. 	Language and Communication   
Although the official language is the Czech one, which is used in the daily life, the presence of programmes offered in English can eradicate the major barrier to academic activity the language barrier. Another interesting group of younger Czech nationals, particularly in urban areas and in university settings, is skilled in English thus making intercommunicating easy. However, a limited proficiency of English by the larger population and select service environments can be a hindrance to the everyday life of the people. To those students prone to learning Czech, the language teaching is generally available, and the command of the language can enhance socialization and provide additional opportunities [41],[43], [44].  
VIII. 	Immigration and Work Opportunities   
The immigration policies of the Czech Republic towards international students are rather liberal; however, they are not as liberal as the immigration policies of some other European countries. The applicants have a right to obtain long-term residence permits for the entire course of their studies and are usually allowed to work part-time (limited to 20 hours per week during the study years and unlimited during vacation times). The provisions can provide students with an opportunity to accumulate professional experience and, at the same time, alleviate their financial situation [45].  
Comparatively, the range of post-graduation job opportunities, in contrast to such jurisdictions as Canada or Australia, which offer explicit post-study work visas, is relatively limited. However, the alumni that find employment in the Czech Republic can apply to labor permits or employee cards. The local labor force qualifies the demand of skilled human resource in a variety of major sectors, particularly in information technology and engineering among other important sectors such as health care and thus offers a variety of opportunities to the new graduates. Moreover, EU Blue Card regime promotes the attraction of highly skilled non-EU professionals throughout the entire European Union, a tool, that can also benefit Czech graduates who want to work outside of the country [45].   
IX. 	Institutional Support and Services   
Czech universities have increasingly realized the necessity of accommodating international students and have created international offices, orientation programmes and support services. The level and quality of these services vary among institutions, although there is an increased realization of the need to align international students both academically and socially. The types of support include buddy programmes, language courses, cultural activities and counselling services [5].   
3.5 Challenges and Limitations   
On the one hand, there are a great number of attractions in the Czech Republic, but, on the other hand, the country faces challenges in the competition of international students. It has relatively low global visibility and brand awareness compared to the traditional destinations, thus the need to be proactive in its marketing and recruitment efforts. In the daily environment, language barrier will be a major problem to students who are not proficient in the Czech language. Moreover, the climate with cold winters might be new and uncomfortable to the students used to the tropical climate of the Indian territories. Bureaucratic processes, including visa applications and renewing of residence permits, are generally complex and time consuming. Moreover, despite the overall welcoming demeanour of the Czech Republic, there may be occasional cases of discrimination or xenophobia, although they are not so widespread, and thus can affect the experience of students [46].  
The literature on the Czech Republic as a destination country among Indian students is rather scarce, however, the works on Indian students in other Central and Eastern European nations provide relevant information. The analysis of Indian students studying in Latvia proves while language barriers and cultural adjustment are major challenges faced by them, the availability of various types of educational programmes and lower overall costs are key motivating factors for students from India [30]. Research on student migration of Kerala to Europe also included the Czech Republic in the list of examined destinations, which highlights the impact{Citation} of the quality and affordability of education. [2].   
To sum up, the Czech Republic is a unique blend of features that make it an attractive destination the Indian students should travel to find high-quality and affordable tertiary education in Europe.  
Its educational capabilities, especially in medicine and engineering, financial accessibility, central European location, safety and the growing Indian student body make it a credible alternative to both the classic Anglophone destinations and other European alternatives.  However, to increase its competitiveness, the organization will require long-term work to raise its visibility, increase support services, integration, and effective communication of its value proposition to the potential Indian students and their families [46]. 
 
 
 
 
 
  
4. Practical Part (study, research, analysis and developing solutions) 
As discussed previously, the main data of the current research was gathered within a five-week period by use of a structured online survey distributed by Google Forms. A multi-channel strategy was used to recruit a heterogeneous sample of participants, including digital platforms (like WhatsApp and Facebook groups, as well as the official portal, called Study in Czechia), called Studyin.cz). Also, a snowball sampling design was used to expand to the target population. After the data collection stage was complete, 178 valid responses were received. The survey instrument was structured into thematic blocks such as demographics i.e. name, age, gender, year of arrival, and the university of study of the individual. Sections related to motivational drivers and future intentions used a five-point Likert scale, which ranged between Extremely Important (5) and Not Important at All (1), which ensured that the perception of the students and their drivers could be analysed quantitatively. 
4.1 Demographics of the survey 
To achieve the user-friendly experience and avoid privacy issues the collection of personal data like names and email addresses were made optional. Making these areas optional, the survey aimed at raising the rate of participation and developing a feeling of safety among the respondents. 
 
4.1.1 Age Distribution of Respondents 
The analysis of the age distribution of respondents found that most of the respondents were within the age of 26 to 33 with 91 individuals and it forms the largest percentage of students. This was almost followed by the 18 to 25 age group, which comprised 69 respondents, which is a group of young professionals. Only 16 students fell between the age bracket 34 to 40, with a marginal group of 2 respondents at the age bracket of 40 or above.  
Figure 1: Age Distribution of Survey Participants 
  
Source: Own research, 2026
4.1.2 Gender Composition 
A total of 110 respondents (62%) were male, and this forms the biggest demographic group, accompanied by 63 females representing 35% of the overall sample. A low proportion (3 %) of the respondents chose the preferred not to say option. 
Figure 2: Gender Distribution of Survey Participants 
  
Source: Own research, 2026
The research study "Gendering international student migration: an Indian case-study" (Sondhi & King, 2017) supports the data, noting that while Indian migration remains predominantly male-led (61.8%), there is a significant shift toward female mobility. Hence, the study highlights that although families are more likely to support their male relatives who relocate abroad than female relatives; the findings indicates the increasing trend of Indian women obtaining education abroad for their own personal development and to have the opportunity to avoid traditional and restrictive gender roles in their native countries as demonstrated by 35.4% of the women sample being composed of female respondents who had received supports from family members. 
  
4.1.3 Year of Arrival in Czech Republic 
During the ten-year study of the period between 2015 and 2025, the early years exhibited a very small level of arrival. For example, there were only five (5) arrivals in 2015 (2.8%) and this number remained below two percent (2%) per annum through 2020. However, incremental changes began in 2021 with a steady increase in arrival data. The greatest volume of change had developed in the latter years of the study. For example, in 2023, twenty-five percent (25%)(n=44) of all arrivals were reported for the participants during this ten-year period and this pattern of growth associated with their arrival. In 2024 and 2025, the next two highest numbers of arrivals, 18% (n=32) and 24%(n=42) respectively, established additional support for the continued strength of immigration into the Czech Republic. 
Thus there was also a significant trend suggesting that close to 66% of all respondents arrived during the three (3) most recent years thus validating that the Czech Republic has quickly increased its prominence as a top source of (both) international education and professional opportunities. Similar evidence regarding the growth of immigration into the Czech Republic, especially from India, is found in a publication from the Czech National Agency for International Education (DZS) "International Student Migration In The Czech Republic" (Czech Ministry of The Interior/IOM 2022) and also from the Czech Statistical Office. 
As of 2022, Indian enrolments had increased by 20% since 2020 due to a 92% visa acceptance rate, expanded engineering courses taught in English, and a cost of living approximately 50-70% less than in Western Europe. In 2024, international students will account for 18% of all students at universities; streamlined online admissions and competitive tuition fees establish the Czech Republic as an attractive location for studying abroad.

4.1.4 Institutional Analysis  
Over two-thirds of the respondents reported attending one of the following institutions: Czech University of Life Sciences (CZU), Czech Technical University (CTU), Charles University (CU), Prague University of Economics and Business (VSE) or University of Chemistry and Technology (UCT). In addition to the above-mentioned schools located in Prague, respondents stated they also attend Masaryk University in Brno and Brno University of Technology (Brno-UT).

4.1.5 Level of Degree 
Participant's academic qualifications are predominantly postgraduate and/or undergraduate degrees; master’s degree candidates make up the majority of the sample (57%, n = 101). The second largest group are undergraduate (42%, n = 75) students. A very small representation exists for PhD students (1%, n = 2). This suggests that Indian students primarily migrate to the Czech Republic in order to pursue professional specialization at the master's degree level. As such, master's degree pathways are the most significant for this demographic.

4.1.6 Language of Study 
Regarding language of instruction, the data reveals a high preference on English-taught programs among the surveyed international students. When asked if their study is in English, and vast majority of 175 respondents (98%) confirmed with YES. In contrast, limited group of students, consisting of 3 individuals (2%), indicated that their program was not taught in English. The motivation and factors are analyzed further in the factors. 
4.2 Factors of the study 
The factors are outlined by the active involvement in the survey with its inherent goal and the satisfaction of the psychological needs. To measure these dimensions in the survey, questions to do with educational quality, degree accreditation, safety, and English language programmed were used. For all 1-5 scale questions, the following assigned values were used: Extremely Important = 5, Very Important = 4, Moderately Important = 3, Slightly Important = 2, and Not Important = 1. Below discuss all the factors starting from highly rated (Extremely important) to least important (Not important). 
4.2.1 Analysis of External Motivational Factors 
a)	English Taught Programs: The availability of English-taught study is the most influential factor for the students. 77.5% (n=138) of students categorized this as extremely important, while 16.9% (n=30) rated it as very important. Combined, over 94% of respondents viewed the language as a decisive factor but with a small impact, individuals with only a marginal 0.6% (n=1) considering it not important. 
 
b)	Quality of Education: Academic standards were primary driver, with 64.0% (n=114) of respondents citing quality of education as extremely important and 23.6% (n=42) as very important. Collectively, nearly 88% of participants prioritized the educational quality of Czech institutions. Only 1.1% (n=2) rated it as slightly important, and 0.6% (n=1) viewed it as not important. 
 
c)	Low Tuition Fee: The financial affordability in respect to academic activities has become a big lure. 62.4% (n=111) of the participants identified low tuition fees as extremely important, while 24.7% (n=44) considered them very important. A small segment of the population, 9.0% (n=16), viewed this factor as moderately important and (n=6) viewed this factor as slightly important (3.4) with only one respondent (0.6%) stating it was not important. 
 
d)	Affordable Living Cost: While analyzing affordability, the general cost of living was highly prioritized. 61.2% (n=109) of respondents rated this as extremely important, and 29.2% 
(n=52) as very important. While students responded with moderately important with (n=15) 
8.4% and slightly important 1.1% (n=2). On the other hand, 0 student responded, “Not Important”. This indicates that for over 90% of the students, the economic manageability of the Czech Republic was a decisive factor in their relocation.  
 
Further, when asked if the cost of living is manageable, the largest segment of the students 57.3% (n=102) described the situation as "manageable but rising." This is a sign of measured optimism, with students currently in a position to meet their expenses whilst being mindful of the rising prices. A total of 35.4% (n=63) of survey respondents positively rated the affordability of the Czech Republic. If you consider the percentage of respondents that selected both "affordable" and "manageable but increasing", nearly 96% of participants considered the Czech Republic to be sustainable as a part of the student's budget. Conversely, a very small portion of respondents (3.4%, n=6) said that the cost of living was "too expensive".  
 
e)	Global Recognition of Degree: This perception played an important part of the students' destination selection process. Of the students, 58.4% (n=104) rated global recognition as Extremely Important and 30.3% (n=54) rated it as “Very Important.” Thus, a total of 88.7% of students rated global recognition as Extremely Important or Very Important. A total of only 1.1% (n=2) of students rated global recognition as Slightly Important and only 0.6% (n=1) of students rated global recognition as Not Important.
 
f)	Scholarship Availability: Compared to other factors, this variable was the most evenly distributed amongst all students. For example, 23.0% (n=41) of the students rated it as Extremely Important and 27.0% (n=48) students rated it as Very Important. The largest single group, 29.8% (n=53), selected Moderately Important. Combined, 20.2% of students rated this aspect at a lower level of importance than Moderate, with 11.8% (n=21) of students rating scholarship availability as Slightly Important and 8.4% (n=15) of students rating it as Not Important. 
 
Figure 3: Analysis of External Motivational Factors: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026
 
4.2.2 Analysis of Internal Motivational Factors:  
a)	Safety and Low crime rate: According to respondents, the most important reason for staying in the Czech Republic was safety. Safety and a low crime rate were rated as extremely important by 78.1% (n=139) of participants and very important by 19.1% (n=34). This suggests that almost 97% of students place a high value on the nation's safe environment. Just 1.1% (n=2) thought it was moderately or slightly important, and just 0.6% (n=1) thought it was unimportant.    
 
Further in the survey, question was asked to rate the safety in Czech Republic from 1 (lowest) to 5 (highest) and the students provided a very high average rating of 4.35. Nearly half of the students (49.4%, n=88) gave the nation's safety the highest possible rating of five stars, according to the distribution of responses. An additional 39.9% (n=71) gave the Czech Republic a rating of 4 stars, indicating that roughly 89% of respondents think it is a very safe place. Perceptions of insecurity, on the other hand, were minimal: only 1.7% (n=3) gave the lowest rating of 1, while 9% (n=16) gave a moderate rating of 3 stars. Notably, not a single respondent chose the 2-star rating.  
 
b)	Job Search Visa (Post Study Work Rights): Having a legal framework available for transitioning from student status into the workforce is a major incentive for obtaining residency. Approximately 66.3% (n=118) of participants feel that Post-Study Work Rights are very important; 26.4% (n=47) considered them to be important. Altogether, over 92% of participants strongly agree regarding how supportive the Job Search Visa will be in their future plans. Only a small number (6.2%, n=11) of students view this area as being of little or no importance (slight) as opposed to the majority who rated it highly significant or very significant (i.e., above average). 
 
c)	Ease of Obtaining a Student Visa: 36.5% (n=65) of the respondents rated the ease of obtaining a student visa as very important, while over half (50.6%, n=90) rated it as extremely important. This implies that in order to draw in and keep this group, efficient immigration procedures are essential. Only 9.6% (n=17) thought this was moderately important, and 3.3% perceived it was either slightly or not important.  
d)	Location in Central Europe (Travel Opportunities): While discussing the geographical advantage of the Czech Republic, (39.3%, n=70) of respondents rated the ease of travel that can be achieved due to the country’s central European location as "extremely important," (38.2%, n=68) rated it as "very important." Although still considered to be a very significant factor for (77.5%) of the entire sample, it was rated with slightly less intensity relative to safety and work rights. (20.8%, n=37) of participants reported that they consider the ease of travel that can be achieved due to the country’s central European location "moderately important". 
 
e)	Indian Community Presence: The factors driving migration include primarily economic (income, employment opportunities) and safety reasons, followed by cultural familiarity and social-support systems. 28.7% (n = 51) of the respondents rated the presence of an Indian community as moderately important; a large number of people continue to value this very highly (27% = 48) as extremely important and 22.5% (n = 40) as very important. The highest number of respondents rated the presence of an Indian community as slightly or not important (21.9%), representing the greatest level of indifference across the factors presented in this survey. 
Figure 4: Analysis of Internal Motivational Factors: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026. 
4.3 Economic Viability and Financial Integration 
The following section of the survey evaluates the economic sides of the student experience, which specifically focuses on income levels, expenditure patterns, and the role of affordability as a primary reason in the migration approach. 
4.3.1 Employment Status  
Regarding the current work status, 86% (n = 153) of the sample confirmed that they were currently employed (in both part-time and full-time jobs). Conversely, 11.8% (n = 21) of the participants were not presently working, and 0.6% of the students responded with an alternative response by indicating that they were looking for a job. 
When asked whether their work is related to their degree, 34.3% (n = 61) of the respondents indicated that their current job is closely related to the field in which they are studying. Contrarily, 36% (n = 64) of the respondents stated that their current job does not relate to the field in which they are studying, while 28.1% (n = 50) indicated a "somewhat" level of connection between their job and the field they are studying. 
 
4.3.2 Working Hours 
The majority of working students, at 29.2% (n = 52), work between 30 and 40 hours a week. The second category of working hours is working between 20 and 30 hours a week, at 27.0% (n = 48). The least number of working students, at 14.6% (n = 26), work more than 40 hours a week. This shows that most of the working students are fully engaged in professional work. The lowest working hours are working between 10 and 20 hours a week at 12.9% (n = 23), while working less than 10 hours a week at 12.4% (n = 22).

4.3.3 Financial Self Sufficiency 
When evaluating the financial self-sufficiency of the employed students, the survey data reveals that a majority of Indian students are able to meet their primary financial obligations through their local earnings. More than half of the respondents 51.7% (n = 92) reported that their income "fully" covers their basic living expenses, indicating a high degree of economic independence. 
Furthermore, 36% (n = 64) stated that their earnings "partially" cover their costs. Only a small segment of the working population, 10.7% (n = 19), indicated that their income is insufficient to cover basic expenses.  
 
4.3.4 The Monthly Income Distribution 
The largest segment of the students, comprising 34.3% (n = 61) of respondents, earns between 20,000 and 40,000 CZK per month. This is followed by 25.3% (n = 45) of the participants who fall into the 10,000 to 20,000 CZK bracket, A small sample of students has achieved higher financial standing; 15.7% (n = 28) earn between 40,000 and 60,000 CZK, and 11.8% (n = 21) have reached a high earning professional status with incomes ranging from 60,000 to 100,000 CZK. Conversely, only 
11.2% (n = 20) of the respondents earn below 10,000 CZK.  
Figure 5. Income distribution: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026
4.3.4 Job opportunities in Czech Republic vs. India 
The perception of the Czech labor market relative to the Indian market is highly positive among the surveyed students. On a scale of 1 to 5 (where 5 represents significantly better opportunities), 48.3% (n=86) of respondents rated job opportunities in the Czech Republic as a 4, with an additional 24.2% (n=43) giving it the highest rating of 5. According to 72.5% of the student, the Czech Republic has better career opportunities than India. A moderate stance was taken by 20.2% (n=36) of participants, while a small minority rated the opportunities lower, with only 2.8% (n=5) at a rating of 2 and 4.5% (n=8) at the lowest rating of 1.  
 
4.3.5 Expected Duration to Secure Employment 
In response to the question, "How many months do you expect it will take to land your first job after graduating?" most Indian students have a realistic but hopeful view of their entry into the Czech job market. About 46.1% (n=82) of respondents expect to secure their first job within 3 to 6 months of graduation. A notable 29.2% (n=52) are even more optimistic, predicting they will land a job in less than 3 months. Together, more than 75% of the students believe they will be employed within six months of finishing their studies. On the other hand, a smaller group of students expects a longer job search. Around 12.4% (n=22) anticipate it will take 6 to 12 months, and 7.3% (n=13) think it will take more than a year. These expectations show a general belief in the accessibility and effectiveness of the local job market for international graduates. 
 
4.4 Monthly Expenditure Analysis 
a)	Monthly Rent Expenditure: The cost of housing is the biggest fixed expense for Indian students. 46.6% (n=83) of respondents spend less than 10,000 CZK monthly on rent, while 35.4% (n=63) spend between 10,000 and 15,000 CZK. Together, 82% of students keep their rent under 15,000 CZK. A smaller group (16.3%, n=29) spends between 15,000 and 30,000 CZK, and only 1.7% (n=3) report rental costs above 30,000 CZK.
 
b)	Travel and Leisure Spending: Students show caution in their spending on leisure and travel. 71.9% (n=128) limit their monthly expenses in this area to under 10,000 CZK, focusing on essentials over fun activities. 18.0% (n=32) spend between 10,000 and 15,000 CZK for leisure and travel, while 9.6% (n=17) spend between 15,000 and 30,000 CZK. Very few (0.6%, n=1) spend more than 30,000 CZK.
 
c)	Monthly Food Expenditure: Food costs are a key part of the monthly budget. 56.7% (n=101) of respondents spend between 1,000 and 4,000 CZK on food each month, while 29.8% (n=53) spend between 4,000 and 7,000 CZK. Over 86% of students manage to keep their food costs under 7,000 CZK. A smaller group (10.7%, n=19) spends between 7,000 and 10,000 CZK, and only 2.8% (n=5) report food spending over 10,000 CZK monthly.
 
d)	Monthly Transport Expenditure: Transportation costs are typically well-managed. According to the survey, 73.0% (n=130) of respondents spend between 1,000 and 4,000 CZK each month on transport. This is followed by 19.1% (n=34) spending between 4,000 and 7,000 CZK. High transport costs are uncommon, with only 5.6% (n=10) spending between 7,000 and 10,000 CZK, and just 2.2% (n=4) spending more than 10,000 CZK, highlighting the affordability of Czech public transport for international students.
 
e)	Monthly Tuition and Materials Expenditure: Expenses for tuition and school supplies vary but are relatively low for most students. 59.0% (n=105) of respondents spend between 1,000 and 4,000 CZK monthly on tuition and materials, while 20.8% (n=37) spend between 4,000 and 7,000 CZK. Notably, 10.7% (n=19) spend above 10,000 CZK each month. The remaining 9.6% (n=17) report spending between 7,000 and 10,000 CZK.
 
f)	Managing living cost: Students rated their ability to manage living costs. 48.3% (n=86) rated their ability a 4 on a 5-point scale, while 20.2% (n=36) gave the highest rating of 5. Altogether, almost 69% of students feel confident in managing their finances in the local setting. A significant portion (28.1%, n=50) expressed a moderate level of confidence with a rating of 3, while only 3.4% (n=6) reported low confidence (ratings 1 and 2).
 
g)	Funding Source: Most respondents, 74.2% (n=132), rely on part-time jobs for their main income. This is closely followed by personal savings, cited by 57.3% (n=102) of students, and family support, which is vital for 48.9% (n=87) of students. Fewer students (12.9%, n=23) use loans, while 7.3% (n=13) benefit from scholarships.

  
 

Figure 6: Student Assessment of monthly Living Expenses: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026
4.5. Important decision factors to choose Czech Republic as study destination 
 
To understand the specific drivers behind the choice of the Czech Republic, respondents were surveyed on the influence of affordability and the local labor market. 
a)	Czech Republic job market: On a scale of 1 to 5 (with 5 being extremely important), 53.9% (n=96) of respondents rated the importance of the job market as a 4, while 27.0% (n=48) assigned it the maximum rating of 5. Combined, over 80% of the participants indicated that the strength and accessibility of the Czech job market were critical factors in their initial decision-making process. Moderate importance was assigned by 13.5% (n=24) of students, while a negligible 5.6% (n=10) of the students considered it a minor or non-existent factor (ratings 1 and 2). 
 
b)	Affordability: While answering if economic accessibility is a primary driver for Indian students selecting the Czech Republic as their study destination. 70.8% (n=126) of respondents confirmed that affordability was a deciding factor in their choice. An additional 23.6% (n=42) indicated that it was "Maybe" a factor. Only a small minority (5.6%, n=10) stated that affordability did not play a role in their decision-making process. 
4.6 Overall Satisfaction and Recommendation 
The final measure of the success of the Czech Republic as an international education provider is operationalized by the subjective satisfaction rates of the sampled students along with their tendencies to recommend the destination to their own personal networks. This final part measures the overall experience of the Indian students, combining academic, financial and social aspects of the experience into a single satisfaction measure. 
 
a)	Overall Satisfaction with the Decision to Study in Czechia: On a scale of 1 to 5 (with 5 being "Highly Satisfied"), a substantial majority of 78.1% of respondents provided a positive rating of 4 or 5. Specifically, 46.6% (n=83) rated their satisfaction as a 4. Meanwhile, 31.5% (n=56) reported being highly satisfied with a rating of 5. In contrast, only a small 3.4% (n=6) expressed dissatisfaction with ratings of 1 and 2. Additionally, 18.5% (n=33) remained neutral.
 
b)	Willingness to Recommend to Other Indian Students: When asked if they would recommend the Czech Republic to other Indian students, 82% of the students responded positively. More than half of the respondents, 52.2% (n=93), selected "Definitely Yes." Meanwhile, 29.8% (n=53) indicated they would "Probably" recommend it. A small group, 14.0% (n=25), expressed uncertainty with "Maybe." Only a total of 3.9% (n=7) said they would not recommend the destination. 




 
Figure 7: Overall Satisfaction and Recommendation chart: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026. 
 
4.7 Comparative Analysis Between Factors 
Based on primary survey data (N = 178), the comparative analysis examines at the monthly spending of Indian students in the Czech Republic. Gender, degree level, institutional choice, and safety perception are the four dimensions in which the study assesses financial patterns. 
Methodology 
To determine monthly expenditure, rent, leisure/travel, food, transport, and tuition/materials were the five categories where self-reported spending was combined. To make statistical analysis easier, ranges of categorical data were mapped to numerical midpoints. Further, the significance of group differences was assessed using independent sample t-tests. 
 
4.7.1 Comparative Analysis of Expenditure 
 
A. Gender-Based Expenditure 
Analyzing the data indicates that males and females are about even in terms of their financial capabilities. Male students spend an average of 31,845 Czech koruna (CZK) monthly, while female students spend about 31,540 CZK each month. The following graph breaks out the average monthly expenditures by gender:  
 



Figure 8: Monthly Expenditure by Gender:  
  
Source: Own research, 2026 

	• 	Hypotheses: 
1.	H0: There is no significant difference in the average monthly spending of male and female Indian students. 
2.	H1: There is a significant difference in the average monthly spending of male and female Indian students.
• 	Statistical One-tailed significance:  Based on a one-tailed t-test (t-score=0.13, p-value=0.897), gender does not seem to impact the cost-of-living for international students attending university in Czech Republic. Therefore, we fail to reject hypothesis H0. Since the p-value of 0.987 is well above the 0.05 standard threshold, gender does not appear to be a significant predictor of spending. This indicates that the cost-of-living of international students is primarily determined by external economic factors (rent, insurance & food prices) and not by gender.
 
B. Degree Level
There is a noticeable difference between academic levels. The average expenditure of master's students is substantially higher (35,029 CZK) than that of bachelor's students (28,233 CZK).  
 


Figure 9: Average Monthly Expenditure by Degree Level: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026 
•	Hypotheses: 
1.	H0: The level of study (Bachelor's vs. Master's) has no significant impact on average monthly spending. 
2.	H1: Master’s level students have a significantly more on average monthly expenditure than Bachelor’s level students. 
•	Statistical Significance: The t-test results confirm that this is statistically significant at the 1% confidence interval because t = 2.67 and p = 0.008. This can be explained by factors such as increased tuition fees in postgraduate programs as well as lifestyle differences associated with age. Since p < 0.01, this is highly significant; therefore, Hypothesis H1 is statistically accepted. The increase in spending by master’s students can be explained by increased tuition fees in English-speaking graduate programs as well as lifestyle differences in accommodation from university-provided student quarters to individual housing. This is in line with Urbánek et al. (2012), who found that older, postgraduate students often move from "budget-student" lifestyles to "independent-resident" lifestyles. 
 
C. Institutional Choice 
The data on the institutional affiliation show slight but statistically insignificant differences. The students of the largest group in the sample, the Czech University of Life Sciences (CZU), on average spend 34,369 CZK, whereas the others spend on average 30,289 CZK. 
 

Figure 10: Average Monthly Expenditure by University: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026 
	• 	Hypotheses: 
1.	H0: Attending the Czech University of Life Sciences (CZU) versus other universities does not significantly impact monthly expenditure. 
2.	H1: Choice of institution significantly impacts a student's monthly expenditure. 
• 	Statistical Significance: The t-test (t = 1.64, p = 0.102) shows that the difference is not noteworthy at the standard 0.05 level, though it suggests that CZU students might face slightly higher costs or have different funding backgrounds. With this value, hypothesis H1 Fail to Reject H0. Meanwhile, the absolute mean for CZU students (34,369 CZK) is higher than that of students at other universities (30,289 CZK), however, the difference is not statistically serious at the 5% level. Therefore, while individual university fees might differ, the regional price parity in major Czech student hubs, such as Prague, Brno, keeps the overall cost of living relatively consistent across different institutions. 
 
D. Safety Perception Based on rating (high(4-5) v/s low or moderate(<4)) 
When assessing the effect of safety on monthly spending levels, interestingly results show that those rating their level of safety as "low/moderate" had an average monthly expenditure of 39,632 CZK versus 31,431 for those rating their safety as "high". 
 




Figure 11: Average Monthly Expenditure by Safety:  
  
Source: Own research, 2026 
•	Hypotheses: 
1.	H0: The perception of Safety by Students does not significantly affect their Expenditures monthly.  
2.	H1: There are major differences in the level of Expenditure by Students who perceive High Safety & Students who have Low/Medium Safety perceptions.
•	Statistical Significance: The statistically significant (t-test result) difference between Students who perceived safety < 4.0 (x̄ = 39.632 CZK) and those that perceive safety ≥ 4.0 (x̄ = 31.431 CZK) indicates that Students with Higher Financial Resourcing are likely to be more critical of Safety and/or live in areas where they are largely conscious about Security Issues. Notwithstanding the fact that the Czech Republic is rated the 12th Safest Nation worldwide (GPI, 2024), the data suggests that those feeling less-than-safe incur a Cost Penalty for doing so, as they are more likely than their safe peers to “stay away” from shared dormitories on the economic periphery by moving into relatively more Expensive Private-Secured Housing in the “City-Center.” Based on the above, the Hypothesis H1 is accepted and the Hypothesis H0 is rejected.   
4.7.2 Comparative Analysis of Affordability: 
 
A. Affordability as a Decision Factor (Yes vs. Maybe) 
Considering the affordability as a decision factor, we examine the relationship between the initial importance of affordability and the actual spending on Rent. 
 

Figure 12: Monthly Rent Affordability  
 
  
Source: Own research, 2026 
•	Hypotheses: 
1.	H0: The impact of affordability on selection of Czech Republic does not impact actual rental cost. 
2.	H1: The amount spent by those students who were mostly swayed by the factor of affordability is significantly different. 

•	Statistical Significance: Results of analysis indicate that based on t-test (t = 2.45, p = 0.015) those who chose to study in Czechia because of affordability had an average rental cost of 11,854 CZK, as compared to 9,342 CZK reported by students who chose an option of "Maybe." Therefore, the positive impact of the "Affordability Pull" has helped Indian students to improve their standard of living. As reported by Studyin.cz (2023), the affordability of Czech Republic in comparison to western Europe makes it possible for students to spend more on higher quality privately provided housing while still staying within total budget available.
 
B. Comparative Gender-based Analysis of Affordability 
Comparative analysis of male and female students has shown the difference in the ability to manage finances. The descriptive statistics show male students reported higher average rating of their financial management in relation to female students. 
 




Figure 13: Affordability Management by Gender: 
  
Source: Own research, 2026 

•	Hypotheses: 
1.	H0: Gender does not impact the perceived ability or the actual ability for Indian students to manage their living expenses.  
2.	H1: Gender plays a significant role in managing the living expenses of Indian students, indicating a quantitative difference in male and female students. 

•	Statistical Significance: T-tests reveal statistically significant male, and female affordability means as demonstrated by the t-test (t = 2.146, p-value = 0.033), mean affordability of male = 3.93, and mean affordability of female = 3.65. The statistical analysis shows a significant difference in the male to female perceived ability to manage affordability, thus supporting hypothesis H1 and rejecting hypothesis H0. Male students appear to have more confidence and/or ability to manage their finances in the Czech Republic than female students. This is consistent with findings from other countries (see Chen & Volpe, 1998) that points out gender differences in terms of financial literacy and confidence among university students internationally. Potential reasons for the difference in confidence or ability could be related to the amounts and/or type of part-time work they were able to find, as well as how they spend their money on housing and integrating with their peers.
 
C. Table 1 Statistical Results Summary (T-Test Table) 
Variable 	Group 1 
Mean 	Group 2 
Mean 	T-
Statistic 	P-
Value 	Significance 	Decision 
Gender 	Male 
(31,845) 	Female 
(31,540) 	0.130 	0.897 	Not Sig. 	Accept 
H0 
Level of 
Degree 	Master's 
(35,029) 	Bachelor's 
(28,233) 	2.673 	0.008 	Significant 	Accept 
H1 
Institution 	CZU 
(34,369) 	Others 
(30,289) 	1.645 	0.102 	Not Sig. 	Accept 
H0 
Safety 	High 
(31,431) 	Low/Mod 
(39,632) 	2.75 	0.007 	Significant 	Accept 
H1 
Affordability 	Yes(11854) 	Maybe(9342) 	2.45 	0.015 	Significant 	Accept 
H1 
Source: Own research, 2026 

D. Table 2. Additional Statistically Significant Factors 
In addition to the original factors mentioned, extensive t-test examinations discovered several others that were statistically significant (p < 0.05) relating to students' income and expenditures in the Czech Republic. 
 
Factor 	Comparison Group 	Target 
Variable 	T-
Statistic 	P-
Value 
Current Student 
Status 	Studying + Job vs. Only 
Studying 	Total 
Expenditure 	2.078 	0.041 
Degree Level 
(Income) 	Master’s vs. Bachelor's 	Monthly 
Income 	2.325 	0.021 
Job Market 
Importance 	High Importance vs. Low 	Total 
Expenditure 	-2.142 	0.035 
Job Competitiveness 	High vs. Low (vs. India) 	Total 
Expenditure 	-2.081 	0.041 
Financial 
Management 	High Ability vs. Low 
Ability 	Total 
Expenditure 	-2.204 	0.031 
Source: Own research, 2026 
 
Brief Academic Interpretation: 
•	Current Status (p = 0.041): Students who have managed to strike a balance between studying and working have significantly higher monthly expenditures. This implies that the additional income earned by working is being re-invested in a higher lifestyle.  
•	Job Market Perception (p = 0.035): Students who have focused more on the Czech job market in their original decision-making process have significantly higher current expenditures. This implies that there is a greater "settlement investment" for those who have viewed the Czech Republic as a long-term career destination. 
•	Living Cost Management (p = 0.031): There is a significant difference in the amounts spent by students who believe they are able to manage their living costs vs those who do not believe they can manage their living costs, indicating that subjective financial literacy is strongly correlated to objective financial behavior. 
4.7.3 Comparison with Previous Research 
 
The findings of this research update prior research findings with regard to:  
 
•	Average Living Costs: Prior studies (Studyin.cz, 2023; AcadFly, 2024) indicated that the amount spent on living expenses per month for Indian Students is in the range of 15,000 - 20,000 CZK. The average expenditure recorded in this study (~31,700 CZK) is significantly higher than the previous research results. This difference in expenditure may be due to the impact of recent increases in costs due to inflation in the Czech Republic (primarily with regard to housing and food) and including tuition/material costs in an overall expenditure amount versus separate yearly estimated costs like in previous studies.
 
•	Motivation and Safety: According to the research by Haldorai et al. (2017), the cost of living is an important motivation for international students to study in the Czech Republic, but it is not the only reason. The results in this survey indicated that safety was also a large motivation for international students from India to study in the Czech Republic, and that was supported by the data collected from the students completing the survey as well as data reported by Live & Study (2025). 
•	Return on Investment: Findings from the research regarding degree level expenditures are similar to findings by Urbánek et al. (2012), which found students pursuing higher levels of education (Masters) are more willing to spend higher amounts than students pursuing lower levels of education on degree-level programs in Europe, and do so expecting to get a larger return on investments associated with education than from their counterparts with lower levels of education. 
•	The "Inflationary Leap" in Living Costs: 
According to historical data from Studyin.cz (2023) and AcadFly (2024), the monthly living expenses were estimated to be between 15,000 CZK to 20,000 CZK. However, according to your research, the new average is approximately 31,700 CZK, which is nearly doubling of expenses over the past three years. This is due to the effects of recent inflation on the cost of living, especially in the prices of housing and food, as well as the additional monthly expenses for "Tuition/Materials". 
•	The Safety-Expenditure Correlation: 
Although Live & Study (2025) identified safety as a major "pull factor" for international students, your research also shows a hidden expense associated with the perception of safety. Students who rate the overall campus safety as "Low/Moderate" have a much higher expenditure level (39,632 CZK), as opposed to those who rate it as "High" (31,431 CZK), (p = 0.007). This implies that international students who rate campus safety as low likely "buy" a sense of security by choosing to stay in a more exclusive, secured city center as opposed to the outskirts of the campus in a shared dorm setting. 



•	The Affordability Paradox: 
Haldorai et al. (2017) conducted research showing that cost was one of the most important reasons students choose to study in a certain country. Your study has shown that students who selected the Czech Republic because of its affordability spend more on rent (average of 11,854 CZK) compared to students who selected the Czech Republic as an option (average of 9,342 CZK) (p = 0.015). Your finding supports Studyin.cz’s (2023) assertion that the relative affordability of the Czech Republic compared to Western Europe enables Indian students to “upgrade” their standard of living while remaining within their total global budget. 
	• 	Analysis of Additional Statistically Significant Factors 
Apart from primary demographic factors, other factors were found to be statistically significant (p < 0.05) in determining financial behaviour. These factors include:  
•	Economic Lifestyle and Activity (p = 0.041): 
Students who engage in economic activities such as studying and working simultaneously exhibit greater total monthly expenditure. This shows that even though 74.2% of students in this study use their part-time income to sustain themselves, it is still reinvested in a better lifestyle.  
•	Job Market Perception and Settlement Investment (p = 0.035): 
Students who value the job market in the Czech Republic when initially determining where they will live will frequently spend more than other students. This would indicate that students view the Czech Republic as a long-term home and therefore are willing to make an investment in order to live there (settlement investment). 
•	Subjective Financial Literacy Impact (p = 0.031): 
Students who strongly agree with their ability to manage spending have significantly different levels of spending than those who do not. This is a confirmation that subjective financial confidence has a strong correlation with actual spending. 
•	Academic Level as a Success Predictor (p = 0.021): 
It is not only that master’s students spend more than their bachelor’s counterparts; they also have significantly higher incomes than the latter. This finding is consistent with that of Urbánek et al. (2012), which implies that academic levels have a positive impact on professional integration and the ability to become "independent-residents" in terms of spending.









4.7.4 Conclusion of Comparative Analysis: 
The research concludes that there has been a fundamental change in the socioeconomic profile of Indian students in the Czech Republic since 2023. This change from a "budget traveler" education model to a "settlement investment" model can be attributed to several critical factors. These factors are:
•	Academic Level as the Primary Economic Predictor: The level of study can be seen as the most important factor when discussing financial behavior. Master’s students are operating on a completely different economic level than bachelor’s students. This can be seen by the increased expenditure for master’s students (35,029 CZK compared to 28,233 CZK) and the increased income potential (p = 0.021).  
•	The Safety-Premium Effect: While the Czech Republic is considered a “safe haven.” (p <0.01), students’ perceptions of safety greatly affect their economics relative to others i.e., students’ with low safety leads to incurring large security premium. As an example, students’ secure private, central housing costs 39,632 CZK over more affordable options. 
•	The Affordability Paradox: The "Affordability Pull" does not lead to reduced overall spending. Rather, it allows students to improve their standard of living. Those who ranked affordability highly spend more on rent (11,854 CZK) than those who ranked it less highly (9,342 CZK).  
•	Professional Integration and Long-term Investment: The high employment levels of 86% indicate that students consider their time at the Czech Republic to be a long-term investment professionally. There was also a significant correlation between prioritizing jobs in the market and high current expenditure (p = 0.035). Therefore, this country is a long-term economically active student who will balance rising living costs with self-sufficiency levels of high and financially focused on building a career in Europe by strategic means. 

Figure 14: Indian Student Mobility & Experience in the Czech Republic: A Comprehensive Statistical Overview 
  
Source: Own research, 2026 
5. Conclusion 

A detailed inquiry into the determinants that attract Indian students to the Czech Republic as a place to pursue a higher education degree demonstrates a complex interaction between psychological needs and economic realities. This study synthesizes the Self-Determination Theory (SDT) and the Push-Pull Model to develop an explanation for the major increase in enrolled Indian students at an uncharacteristically "non-traditional" destination between 2023 and 2025.  
Validation of Research Hypotheses and Economic Findings: The practical analysis of 178 students offered thorough statistical testing for all research hypotheses:
•	Gender-Based Expenditure Parity: The study failed to reject the null hypothesis regarding spending differences between genders (p = 0.897), indicating that the cost of living is largely standardized by external market factors like rent and food prices. However, there were significant gender differences with respect to financial management . Male respondents reported greater confidence in their ability to manage their finances than females (p = 0.033). 
•	Academic Expenditure Variance: The second hypothesis was statistically validated (p = 0.008) in that Master'-level students show significantly higher levels of expenditure (~35,029 CZK) than Bachelor'-level students (~28,233 CZK). The higher cost of Master's programs for English speakers, in addition to a transition to privately rented accommodation, are believed to be the causes of this difference.
•	The Safety-Premium Effect: A significant finding is that the study accepted the fourth hypothesis (p = 0.007). Students who reported lower levels of safety reported significantly greater expenditures (~39,632 CZK). This indicates that students who feel less safe "purchase" safety by choosing to live in the city center in private, secured housing instead of sharing an affordable dormitory-style apartment with other students. 
•	The Affordability Paradox: According to Hypothesis 5, the students who were attracted to the lower costs of living in the Czech Republic ended up paying more for rent on average (11,854 CZK) than the students whose cost of living wasn’t a primary reason for coming to the Czech Republic (9,342 CZK) (p = 0.015). The "Affordability Pull" allows students to increase their standard of living, without exceeding their overall budget for studying abroad.  
Theoretical Synthesis: SDT and Push-Pull Dynamics: The Literature Review established that while the 'push' factors in India, such as competition and capacity, motivate outward migration, the 'pull' factors in the Czech Republic fulfill the three core psychological needs of the SDT theory:
•	Autonomy: Students seek independence from domestic social restrictions. The Czech Republic’s student-centered pedagogical atmosphere and the opportunity for selfauthorized learning satisfy this need. 
•	Competence: The high importance placed on English-taught programs (94%) and Quality of Education (88%) reflects the students' drive to develop global professional talents. 
•	Relatedness: While the presence of an Indian community is a secondary driver, it remains "moderately to extremely important" for the majority, helping to alleviate the isolation often associated with international transition. 


Practical Implications of Lived Experiences: The practical aspect of this study emphasizes a fundamental shift towards a "settlement-investment" model: 
•	Professional Integration: An astonishing 86% of respondents are currently employed, and more than 75% expect to find a professional position within six months of graduation. This suggests that Indian students view the Czech Republic not only as a place to study but also as a long-term professional destination. 
•	The "Inflationary Leap": The study points to a substantial increase in living costs. While historical literature (2023-2024) suggests that monthly living costs range from 15,000 to 20,000 CZK, this study reveals a new average cost of ~31,700 CZK. This calculates that the cost of living has essentially doubled due to the impact of recent inflation on the cost of rent and food. 
•	Institutional Satisfaction: Despite rising costs, 78.1% of students are satisfied with their decision, and 82% would recommend the destination to others. 
4. Final Remarks 
In 2026, Indian students in the Czech Republic nation are an economically active, highly motivated individuals who balance the pursuit of high-quality, affordable education with a strategic focus on European labor market integration. Moreover, the country’s unique combination of safety (97% priority), post-study work rights (92% priority), and strategic Central European location has successfully positioned it as a prime alternative to traditional Anglophone destinations. To maintain this trajectory, the nation must continue to address administrative hurdles and rising costs to ensure the psychological and financial well-being of its growing international talent pool. 
 
 







6. References
 
[1]	Zeltner, S., Haas, C., & Hillmert, S. (2025). Mobility decisions of non-European degree mobile students in Germany, Italy and the United Kingdom. European Journal of Education. Available from: https://doi.org/10.1111/ejed.70258 
[2]	Biju, M. R., Prasad, A. S., & Nair, S. (2024). Student migration from Kerala to Europe: A critical review of governance processes. International Journal For Multidisciplinary Research, 6(3). Available from:  https://doi.org/10.36948/ijfmr.2024.v06i03.22188 
[3]	Mehdi, T., Moretti, S., & Silj, A. (2018). The European Union as a preferred destination for Indian migrants? Prospects, patterns, policies and challenges. In Migration from South Asia (pp.1-24). Routledge.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.4324/9780429434556-1  
[4]	Yue, Y., Liang, J., & Liu, Z. (2022). International students' motivation to study abroad: An empirical study based on expectancy-value theory and self-determination theory. Frontiers in Psychology, 13, 841122.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.3389/fpsyg.2022.841122  
[5]	Kovács, Z. (2022). Study abroad motivations, satisfaction and loyalty: The impact of service quality, acculturation and international student characteristics in higher education [Doctoral dissertation]. Corvinus University of Budapest. Available from:  https://doi.org/10.14267/phd.2021052  
[6]	Schartner, A., & Cho, Y. (2020). Intercultural transitions in higher education: International student adjustment and adaptation. Available from:  https://pmc.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/articles/PMC7519382/ 
[7]	Guru, S., Pradhan, B., & Panda, S. (2021). Ranking the determinants for international education destination decision of Indian students: Application of fuzzy analytical hierarchical process. Vision: The Journal of Business Perspective, 25(4), 
444455.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.1177/0972262921991940  
[8]	Borodina, T. (2022). International students' motivation to study abroad – "Why are you studying at a Hungarian university?" Journal of Education in Black Sea Region, 7(2), 6276.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.31578/jebs.v7i2.259  
[9]	Mukherjee, S., & Chanda, R. (2012). Student mobility from India to selected European countries: The case of Germany and France. Social Science Research Network.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.2139/SSRN.2179724  
[10]	Kumar, S., Sharma, R., & Singh, P. (2024). Analyzing the impact of students preference on pursuing higher education in abroad. International Journal For Multidisciplinary Research, 6(3).  Available from: https://doi.org/10.36948/ijfmr.2024.v06i03.20163  
[11]	Mukherjee, S., & Chanda, R. (2012). Indian student mobility to selected European countries - An overview. Social Science Research Network. Available from:  https://doi.org/10.2139/SSRN.2116198  
[12]	Wadhwa, R. (2016). Students on move: Understanding decision-making process and destination choice of Indian students. Higher Education for the Future, 3(1), 54- 
75. Available from:  https://doi.org/10.1177/2347631115610221  
[13]	Singh, J. K. N., & Jack, G. (2018). Factors affecting students' preferences to study abroad programs: A case of Indian business school students. Journal of Teaching in International Business, 29(1), 1-21. Available from:  https://doi.org/10.1080/08975930.2017.1412850  
[14]	Cherian, L., & Robertson, S. (2024). Special issue: Middle-class Indian students: Migration recruiters and aspirations. Population, Space and Place, 30(8), e2836.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.1002/psp.2836  
[15]	Chanda, S., & Batra, M. (2024). Unscrambling the preference puzzle: An in-depth exploration of why Indian international students shy away from home institutions for Master's programs. Asian Education and Development Studies, 13(4), 312-329.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.1108/aeds-05-2024-0105 
[16]	Kumar, A., Singh, R., & Sharma, V. (2024). Using structural equation model (SEM) to analyse global student mobility programs in higher education in India. Research Square.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.21203/rs.3.rs-3852212/v1  
[17]	Abdin, M. J. (2023). South Asian students' migration to, within and from Finland and Sweden: Connecting the dots to arrivals and departures. Fennia, 201(1), 76-92.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.11143/fennia.119776  
[18]	Perez-Encinas, A., Rodriguez-Pomeda, J., & de Wit, H. (2021). Factors influencing student mobility: A comparative European study. Studies in Higher Education, 46(12), 
25282541.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.1080/03075079.2020.1725873  
[19]	Hercog, M., & van de Laar, M. (2017). Motivations and constraints of moving abroad for Indian students. Journal of International Migration and Integration, 18(3), 749770.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.1007/S12134-016-0499-4  
[20]	Hercog, M., & Sondhi, G. (2016). Europe as unlikely immigrant destination: Location choice for internationally mobile students in India. European Journal of Higher Education, 6(4), 345361.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.1080/21568235.2016.1231581  
[21]	Bhandari, R., & Belyavina, R. (2022). Redesigning international student mobility for global competence development. In 2022 IEEE Global Engineering Education Conference 
(EDUCON) (pp. 1856-1861). IEEE.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.1109/educon52537.2022.9766799  
[22]	Lupu, D. (2020). Choosing an academic path, a true act of responsibility. Journal 
Plus Education, 26(2), 7-14. Available from:  https://doi.org/10.24250/jpe/2/2020/dl  
[23]	Pui-Yee, C., & Balakrishnan, V. (2015). Internationalisation of higher education: Proposed framework on international students' satisfaction. Conference paper. Available from: https://www.researchgate.net/publication/298091245_Internationalisation_of_higher_ed ucation_ Proposed_framework_on_international_students'_satisfaction  
[24]	Alfattal, E. (n.d.). Globalization, internationalization, marketing, and college choice: Key factors affecting international students' mobility. Available from:  https://scholarworks.lib.csusb.edu/etd/494/.  
[27]	Chirwa, G. (n.d.). Erasmus+ student's motives from the perspective of self-determination theory: A review of literature. Available from:  https://ijcsrr.org/wpcontent/uploads/2024/01/65-2601-2024.pdf.  
[28]	Muthuswamy, N. (n.d.). The influence of self-determined motivation and goals of international students to study abroad on subjective well-being: The mediating role of psychological needs satisfaction. Available from: https://ojed.org/jis/article/view/6369/2718  
[29]	King, B., & Gardiner, S. (2022). Educational travellers and destination appeal: 
Deconstructing intrinsic motivations. Journal of Vacation Marketing, 28(3), 339353.  
Available from: https://doi.org/10.1177/13567667221078241  
[30]	Apsite-Berina, E., Bērziņš, M., & Krisjane, Z. (2023). Experiences of international students in Latvia: The case of India and Germany. Discourse and Communication for 
Sustainable Education, 14(1), 106-122.  Available from: https://doi.org/10.2478/dcse-20230009  
[31]	NIEMIEC, C. P., RYAN, R. M. and DECI, E. L. Self-determination theory and the relation of autonomy to self-regulatory processes and personality development [online]. 2010. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://ssrlsig.org/wp-content/uploads/2018/01/niemiecryan-deci-2010-self-det-theory-and-the-relation-of-autonomy-to.pdf 
[32]	LEE, E. S. A theory of migration [online]. 1966. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://emigratecaportuguesa.wordpress.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/04/1966-atheory-of-migration.pdf 
[33]	ICEF MONITOR. More than 750,000 Indian students abroad in 2018 [online]. 
2019. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://monitor.icef.com/2019/11/more-than-
750000-indian-students-abroad-in-2018/ 
[34]	CHIRKOV, V. Self-determination and well-being of international students [online]. 2009. 
[cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://selfdeterminationtheory.org/SDT/documents/2009_Chirkov_TRE.pdf  
[35]	CHIRKOV, V., RYAN, R. M., KIM, Y. and KAPLAN, U. Differentiating autonomy from individualism and independence: A self-determination theory perspective on internalization of cultural orientations and well-being. Journal of Personality and Social Psychology [online]. 
2003. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://selfdeterminationtheory.org/SDT/documents/2003_ChirkovRyanKimKaplan.pdf 
[36]	MAZZAROL, T. and SOUTAR, G. N. Push–pull factors influencing international student destination choice [online]. 2001. CEMI Discussion Paper. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://cemi.com.au/__static/e19b19953eb5d232da28c9e66f7d7ba3/cemi-dp0105-mazzaroland-soutar-2001.pdf 
[37]	WILKINS, S. Who benefits from foreign universities in the Arab Gulf states? An examination of past and present influences [online]. Journal of Studies in International Education, 2011. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://purehost.bath.ac.uk/ws/portalfiles/portal/271725/Wilkins_JSIE_2011.pdf 
[38]	NEDELKOVÁ, K. Key factors in the international migration of young people for higher education [online]. Brno: Masaryk University, [n. d.]. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://is.muni.cz/th/n4z57/482677_Nedelkova_Key_factors_in_the_international_migr ation_of_young_people_for_higher_education.pdf 
[39]	CZECH NATIONAL AGENCY FOR INTERNATIONAL EDUCATION AND 
RESEARCH. Foreign students in the Czech Republic: Statistical report [online]. Prague, 
2021. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://www.dzs.cz/sites/default/files/202110/DZS_zprava_o_zahranicnich_studentech_EN_WEB_0.pdf 
[40]	CHARLES UNIVERSITY. Facts and figures [online]. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://cuni.cz/UKEN-106.html 
[41]	CZECH STATISTICAL OFFICE. Education of foreigners [online]. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://csu.gov.cz/education-offoreigners?pocet=10&start=0&podskupiny=294&razeni=-datumVydani 
[42]	CZECH RECTORS CONFERENCE. CRC members and EUA President meeting – T. 
Zima, 24. 9. 2021 [online]. 2021. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://www.crc.muni.cz/media/3347380/crc-members-and-eua-president-meeting-tzima-2492021.pdf 
[43]	STUDY IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC. Facts and figures [online]. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://www.studyin.cz/live-work/facts-and-figures/ 
[44]	CZECHUNIVERSITIES.COM. Discover Czechia [online]. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://www.czechuniversities.com/category/discover-czechia 
[45]	EMBASSY OF THE CZECH REPUBLIC IN NEW DELHI. Consular section – visas 
[online]. [cit. 2026-02-17]. Available from: https://mzv.gov.cz/newdelhi/en/ko/index.html 
[46]	KALU, Nite Orji, JANÍK, Tomáš and KUROWSKI, Martina. Adjustment issues of international students in the Czech Republic: Prevailing social conditions and financial challenges. Czech-Polish Historical and Pedagogical Journal, 2024, vol. 16, no. 2, p. 46–65. DOI 10.5817/cphpj-2024-010. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
